Pergamon
0021-9630(95)00136-0
J. Child Psychoi. Psychiat. Vol. 37. No. I. pp. 13-33. 1996
Published by Elsevier Science Ltd
© 1996 Association for Child Psychology and Psychiatry
Printed in Great Britain.
0021.963(V96 $15.00+ 0.00
Somatisation in Children
M. Elena Garralda
St Mary's Hospital Medical School, London, U.K.
This review summarises recent work on somatisation in childhood. Minor physiological
dysfunction may play a part in a number of cases and associated psychiatric disorders are
commonly though not universally found. Contributory family factors include high rates of
health problems and of parental psychological distress and there is some evidence for the
role of family modelling and reinforcement of illness behaviour. There is suggestive
evidence linking somatisation to emotional closeness in families, to family togetherness
around health matters and to anomalies in children's social relationships. Somatisation in
children can respond to treatments involving cognitive-behavioural and family techniques
as well as to sensitive, psychologically sound advice from paediatricians.
Keywords: Somatisation, child psychiatry
Introduction
Somatisation is defined as the manifestation of
psychological difficulty or distress through somatic
symptoms, a tendency to experience and communicate
somatic distress and symptoms unaccounted for by
pathological findings, to attribute them to physical
illness and to seek medical help (Lipowsky, 1988). It
encompasses a wide spectrum of symptoms referred to
various organs. It overlaps with terms such as unexplained or functional physical symptoms which also
indicate a lack of explanatory organic factors but is
broader in assuming a major role for psychological
factors. It is a central feature for a number of ICD and
DSM diagnoses, mainly classified under somatoform
disorders.
The notion that children somatise distress or manifest
distress or difficulty through somatic symptoms is well
established. It is clear from general population surveys
of young children with abdominal pains for example—
and the same is likely to apply to other functional
symptoms—that mothers are well aware that the pain
may be related to "stress" or worries about school and
that the child may be using the pain to avoid something
he or she finds difficult (Faull & Nicol, 1986). Most
parents report that the child tends to be reluctant to go to
school when having "tummy ache". Common parental
reactions are either to play down the symptoms so that
the child learns to cope and forget about it or to comfort
and reassure the child and to try to find out the cause.
Analgesic medication is often given and it is common
for parents and young children to provide some sort of
psychological relief or "magic rub".
When confronted with a child with physical sympRequests for reprints to Prof. M. Elena Garralda, Academic
Unit of Child and Adolescent Psychiatry, St Mary's Hospital
Medical School, Norfolk Place, London W2 IPG, U.K.
toms mothers' accounts indicate a process whereby they
test the children's claims on sickness against suspicions
of feigning illness and children are categorised as
"pretending", "upset" or "ill" (Prout, 1988). Most
mothers feel that their knowledge of their child is
intimate and allows them to make this decision though
children themselves often feel that if they are determined
and persistent enough they can succeed almost always,
and recall instances on interview of successful feigning
with a mood of irony and pleasure (Prout, 1988).
If the child is not ill, parents consider either that the
child is not stoical enough and is too ready to give in to
feelings of unwellness, or that the child has an emotional
disturbance producing the symptoms. Fathers in particular tend to express themselves forcefully on the need
to ensure that children do not see illness as a way of
retreating from demands upon them.
An impaired ability to verbalise distress is regarded as
underlining the communication of distress through
somatic symptoms (Lloyd, 1986). Since children have
immature cognitive verbal skills and their vocabulary for
emotional expression is limited, somatisation should be
particularly common in childhood. From a medical
perspective this tendency becomes a problem if it is
exaggerated and it leads to handicap and recurrent
medical use.
There has been comparatively little research in this
area in the psychological literature in the past. In recent
years there has been an upsurge of interest and it is to be
expected that the mechanisms underlining somatisation
in children and their treatment will become better
understood. Recent reviews include those by Lask and
Fosson (1989), Benjamin and Eminson (1992) and
Campo and Fritsch (1994).
An earlier selected review of child psychiatry
syndromes with a somatic presentation outlined the
nature, frequency and associations of somatisation or
functional symptoms in children (Garralda, 1992). It
considered somatisation disorders of childhood as
13
14 M. ELENA GARRALDA
Table 1.
ICD-IO and DSM-IV Disorders (D) with Somatisation as a Key Feature
ICD-IO
F45
F45.0
F45.1
F45.2
F45.3
F45.4
F45.8
F45.9
F44
F44.4-F44.7
F48
F48.0
SOMATOFORM DISORDERS
Somatization D
Undifferentiated somatoform D
Hypochondriacal D
Somatoform autonomic dysfunction
Persistent somatoform pain D
Other somatoform D
Somatoform D unspecified
DISSOCIATIVE (CONVERSION) D
Dissociative D of movement and sensation
OTHER NEUROTIC D
Neurasthenia
DSM-IV
300.81
300.81
300.7
300.7
307.80
307.89
300.81
300.11
SOMATOFORM DISORDERS
Somatisation disorder
Undiferentiated somatoform D
Hypochondriasis
Body dysmorphic D
PAIN D associated with:
— psychological factors
— both psychological factors and a general
medical condition
Somatoform D not otherwise specified
Conversion D
represented in contemporary psychiatric diagnostic
systems (namely ICD & DSM). These systems list a
number of conditions where physical symptoms are a
key feature but conditions are spread under a variety of
main headings.
They may be grouped as follows:
A. When mental factors are assumed to have major
aetiological significance for the physical symptoms (i.e.
hysteria or conversion disorder; somatoform pain
disorder; neurasthenia, more commonly called fatigue
syndrome).
B. When mental factors influence the development of
a physical condition with demonstrable physical pathology or physiological processes (for example asthma or
ulcerative colitis).
C. When physical symptoms are the main presenting
feature of well recognised and overtly manifested
psychiatric or development conditions (for example
eating and sleeping disorder, bed wetting and abnormal
movement disorder).
These three groups of conditions differ in the primacy
of the physical or psychological symptom. Whereas both
parents and clinicians are likely to see the third group as
related to psychiatric or developmental problems, the
opposite is true for the second group where the
psychological changes tend to be seen as secondary to
the stress of coping with the chronic illness or
aggravating it.
The first group includes conditions where somatisation is a key clinical feature. These conditions are
outlined in Table 1 and will be a main focus of this
paper. However their nosological validity and boundaries remain insufficiently tested in children and
adolescents. Since much of the relevant literature is on
children with functional or unexplained symptoms and
on somatisation broadly defined this wili also be
reviewed.
The earlier revision addressed the literature aiming to
draw converging evidence from often very methodologically varied reports on somatisation syndromes and
disorders (Garralda, 1992). It identified a characteristic
pattern of associated factors for somatisation-related
complaints and disorders. It highlighted the fact that in
many cases a physical illness or ailment precipitates the
somatising disorder or co-exists with it so that the
assumption that a problem is either physical or
psychological in origin is too simphstic to represent
the interactions between physical illness and somatisation. Most children with somatisation do not have
associated psychiatric disorders but a third to a half do
and emotional spectrum disorders (i.e. anxiety or
depressive disorders) are most common with antisocial
problems (i.e. conduct disorder), being considerably less
common. Child personality features seem to be present
in many children, who are described as generally
conscientious or obsessional, as sensitive, insecure and
anxious. These descriptions have however been based on
clinical accounts and work is required using controlled
designs to test the specificity of these associations.
Family factors have been known to contribute. Family
health problems and preoccupation with illness are often
mentioned. This is seen as likely to anxiously sensitise
both children and parents to the experience of physical
symptoms and to lead to seeking reassurance from
medical services. Other features noted in some of these
families are high academic and behavioural expectations. In a small number of families profound family
disorganisation and sexual abuse are important contributions to somatisation.
The present review will draw on the analysis and
conclusions of the previous paper but it will update these
and it will expand on the possible mechanism involved
by examining biological as well as psychological
processes, and by drawing on the adult literature when
required to illuminate any particular issues. It will also
address treatment.
SOMATISATION IN CHILDREN 15
Epidemiology and Assessment of Somatisation in
Children
Childhood aches and pains are a common functional
symptom in children and they are often regarded as
manifestations of somatisation. Other fairly common
symptoms include tiredness, dizziness or blackouts.
Problems such as loss of limb function are considerably
more rare. Epidemiological studies of children and
adolescents have found that parents of 11% of girls
and 4% of boys aged 12-16 years either report somatic
symptoms in their children or perceive them as sickly
(Offord et al., 1987). Enquiry of adolescents reveals that
10% describe frequent or persistent symptoms. These are
more common in girls and headaches and poor sleep are
most frequent (Aro et al., 1987).
Goodman and McGrath (1991) have recently reviewed the epidemiological evidence specifically on
functional pains in children. They have pointed out the
methodological problems bedeviling this work. Studies
are often based on parental reports so that the child's
point of view may be missing. The measures of pain
used are very variable and its severity is not always
assessed with the result that severe and mild pain may be
combined. In addition most studies are retrospective
although the use of pain diaries is becoming more
common. Sample representativeness is another issue of
contention and crucially few studies incorporate measures of disability: only school absence is mentioned and
even this is done infrequently. Inevitably there is
considerable variation in rates of aches and pains from
different studies but perhaps the most consistent figure is
of 2-10% of children with problems in this area.
Assessment
In line with the growing popularity of the use of ICD
and DSM ciassificatory systems increasing attention has
been directed in recent work to somatization disorders
which often involve the presence of several and not just
one main functional symptom and identify the small
group of children who display particularly handicapping
problems. Questionnaires have been developed to assess
the combined presence of multiple symptoms in a
systematic way (Garber, Walker & Zeman, 1991;
Benjamin & Eminson, 1992). These questionnaires vary
in the time-span covered (they may address problems in
the last two weeks or lifetime prevalence of difficulties)
and they fail to assess in a satisfactory way four essential
aspects of somatization: namely: (i) the associated
physical or psychiatric pathology which may account
for the physical symptoms; (ii) the severity and handicap
caused by the symptoms; (iii) whether psychological
factors actually influence the physical symptoms; (iv)
the degree of medical help-seeking for them. However,
they do examine some of these issues thus allowing a
judgement to be made on the likelihood that a physical
symptoms may have some of the features of somatization.
Garber et al. (1991) have developed the Children's
Somatization Inventory. This questionnaire contains 36
psychophysiological symptoms including 12 symptoms
derived from the Hopkins Symptoms Checklist, a
popular adult checklist, and 27 symptoms from the
DSM-III list of symptoms required to reach a diagnosis
of somatization disorder. The authors used it with a 540
child and adolescent community sample. The overall
mean number of somatic complaints reported by the total
sample was 1.94 (SD 3.05). Older girls (over 12 years of
age) had higher scores than boys, and older boys had
lower scores than younger boys under 11 years of age.
Most common were headaches (present in 25%), low
energy (23%), sore muscles, nausea and upset stomach,
back pain, stomach pains (15%), blurred vision, weakness and food intolerance. The importance of obtaining
information from both parents and children was highlighted by the low correlations (r = 0.02) between child
and parent scores.
Three-month test-retest reliabilities were r = 0.50 for
well patients and 0.66 for those with recurrent abdominal
pains. A positive association was found between the
number of somatic complaints and school absence
(r = 0.44) and this provides a measure of associated
handicap (Walker, Garber & Green, 1991). Further
validity for its ability to identify children with
handicapping difficulty or functional problems was
indicated from the comparison of children reporting
four or more symptoms against the rest. Children and
adolescents with more symptoms reported significantly
more frequently features of depression and anxiety and
had lower self-reported competence scores (Garber et al.,
1991).
Benjamin and Eminson (1992) developed a similar
questionnaire and used it to investigate lifetime prevalence of symptoms in a British sample of 11-16 years
of age children and adolescents. They found positive
associations between symptoms and affective disorders,
particularly in girls. In nearly one in five symptomatic
children they identified high levels of worry about health
and symptoms preventing school attendance. Health
attitudes and inclination to consult were significantly
and positively correlated.
Since it is common for children to report more than
one functional symptom at a time, both Garber et al.
(1991) and Benjamin and Eminson (1992) have
examined children with multiple complaints. Garber et
al. found that over the two weeks prior to completion of
the questionnaires 15% reported four or more symptoms.
Only 1.1% reported 13 or more somatic complaints, the
quantity specified to qualify for a diagnosis of
somatisation disorder in DSM-III-R. Benjamin and
Eminson (1992) found much higher rates (over 10%)
of children with 13 or more symptoms but in contrast
with Garber et al.'s theirs were lifetime prevalences.
Although handicap and medical help-seeking were not
individually reported it seems likely that these would
have been present in this small number of children
making this a likely rate for DSM-III-R somatization.
It has been suggested (Campo & Fritsch, 1994) that
the requirement of 13 different symptoms for somatization in childhood is too stringent and that lesser numbers
may be as likely to constitute a disorder but this needs to
be confirmed empirically. In fact the number of
symptoms required for somatisation disorder diagnoses
16 M. ELENA GARRALDA
in the more recent classifications has been reduced to
eight in DSM-IV and six in ICD-IO.
and a psychiatric assessment and is costly to set up in
epidemiological studies.
Is Symptom Clustering of Use in Clarifying the
Primary Role of Organic and Psychological Factors?
Several authors have examined the clustering of
physical symptoms reported by children and adolescents
but the results are only of limited use in clarifying their
psychological or physical nature. Garber et al. (1991)
carried out a factor analysis on the results of their
recently developed symptom scale. This yielded four
factors: the first accounting for 23% of the variance
contained eight items with neurological associations
consistent with symptoms described under DSM-III-R
conversion or pseudoneurological symptoms (i.e. seizures, fainting, memory loss).
Factor 2 accounted for 6% of the variance and
included cardiovascular and neurological symptoms
(heart beating too fast, pain in chest, breathlessness,
dizziness, numbness and tingling); factor 3 (4% of the
variance) included gastrointestinal symptoms such as
stomach pain and nausea, and factor 4 (also 4% of the
variance) involved pain and weakness. Although not
directly investigated by the authors, it would seem
plausible that the first two factors would be specially
likely to be related to and perhaps be a manifestation of
mood changes or disorders of childhood. Rauste-Wright
and Wright (1992) carried out a factor analysis on
symptom questionnaires scores completed by 285
Finnish 15-16-year olds. Factor 1 consisted of symptoms
related to breathing, faints and headaches and had a
stronger association with negative psychological and
behavioural features than factor 2 symptoms which
tended to include abdominal symptoms, mainly digestive
problems.
Work on pre-adolescent children with estabhshed
anxiety states (Beidel, Christ & Long, 1991) provide
some confirmation for the notion that symptoms
indicating cardiac and respiratory as well as neurological
distress (choking feelings, palpitations, fainting, sweating but not stomach aches) are commoner in anxious
children than in psychologically healthy controls.
Interestingly anxious children in this study tended to
have somatic and cognitive components usually associated with panic attacks without actually having panic
attacks which is in line with their rarity before
adolescence. Children with social phobias had most
physical symptoms indicating the possible importance of
social factors for somatization in children with psychological problems (see later).
However, the above studies have not been designed to
examine specifically the links between different individual physical symptoms and psychological dysfunction
and the conclusion that certain clusters of physical
symptoms are specially related to psychopathology
remains tentative.
Clearly to assess the "functional" (nonorganic and
possibly psychologically related) nature of symptoms it
is important to have information on associated organic
and psychiatric conditions. This requires both a medical
The Place of Organic Factors in the Definition and
Assessment of Child Somatisation
An alternative method of assessing somatisation is to
base the assessment not on the presence of certain
physical symptoms, but on the clinical judgement by the
examining physician that the physical symptom whatever its nature is indeed being influenced by psychological factors. Although as discussed above some
symptoms appear to have a particular affinity with
mood changes it is generally accepted that any
symptoms presented may be an expression of psychological difficulty, as judged by the fact that the
pathological findings are out of keeping with the severity
of the symptom or are erroneously attributed by patients
to organic factors, and that they are clearly aggravated
by psychological and social factors.
This assessment perspective is most appropriate when
examining somatization in subjects presenting to medical services. Garralda and Bailey (1987, 1990) used it to
ascertain the frequency of somatization amongst schoolchidren presenting to general practitioners and to general
paediatric clinics. The identification rates found were
one in five children in general practice and one in two in
secondary paediatric clinics. This method has the
disadvantage of relying on assessments by doctors with
varying degrees of experience and inclination to enquire
about psychological factors and though more in tune
with clinical practice than the mere listing of physical
symptoms it requires training of doctors involved to be a
valid method to assess childhood somatization.
If the nature of the symptom instead is used to assess
somatization, presumed functional symptoms are reported in about 10% child and adolescent attenders to
medical services (Starfield et al., 1980). But assuming
that certain symptoms are functional by definition is
problematic. Syndromic definitions do not fully resolve
the problem either as exemplified by recent work on
headaches and migraine in childhood. The most common
headaches in children fall into two main categories:
migraine and tension headaches. Physiological mechanisms are advocated to explain migraine whereas
psychological factors are seen as playing a major role
in the aetiology or continuation of tension headaches. In
practice the differentiation between migraine and tension
headaches is often not clearcut and both may co-exist in
the same patient. There has not been universal agreement
or clinical consistency in what constitutes the necessary
clinical picture for migraine attacks.
To minimise inter-observer variability the Intemational Headache Society (IHS) devised in 1988 new
standard criteria for the diagnosis of different types of
headaches, but the validity of this classification has not
been fully established (Hopkins, 1992). Diagnostic
concordance when comparing IHS and routinely clinical
criteria in children has been found to be only moderate
(total agreement in 61% of 72 children diagnosed as
having migraine in a paediatric neurology clinic)
(Seshia, Wolstein, Booth, Reggin & Adams, 1994).
Using IHS criteria recent studies in the U.K. have found
SOMATISATION IN CHILDREN 17
rates for migraine ranging from 3.7% of 3-11-year-olds
in a single general practice (Mortimer, Kay & JaronI,
1992) to 10.6% of 5-15-year-olds in the general
population (Abu-Arefeh & Russell, 1994).
Only 0.9% of children in the latter study had tension
headaches, but to diagnose tension headache it is an IHS
requirement that the child should have behavioural or
personality problems and the methodology used to assess
this was not satisfactory. This requirement seems in any
case too stringent since it is possible and indeed common
for psychological factors to influence headaches in the
absence of psychiatric problems (Garralda, 1992). To
ascertain the psychological contribution to headaches it
would seem more appropriate to assess carefully whether
psychological factors influence the headache rather than
to force mutually exclusive diagnoses in what are
frequently coexisting clinical pictures.
Biological atid Psychological Associations of
Functional Somatic Symptoms
In contrast with epidemiological studies of children
presenting with a variety of possibly functional symptoms a number of reports continue to focus on children
with individual problems (for example abdominal pains,
conversion disorders) often presenting to secondary or
tertiary medical or psychiatric units.
In the earlier quoted review this author concluded that
the risk factors for somatization in children appeared to
be remarkably similar, whether based on epidemiological studies or on tertiary centre samples, whether focused
on the presence of individual or of combined physical
symptoms (Garralda, 1992), However, work in this area
has tended to be based on uncontrolled investigations or
on insufficiently discriminating psychological measures.
Recent descriptive uncontrolled studies often confirm
rather than expand on previous findings but some work
does take the original findings further and will be
discussed here with special emphasis on associations and
possibly explanatory mechanisms of functional somatic
symptoms in children. The adult literature on specific
syndromes which are closely related to childhood
equivalents is considered when appropriate.
Earlier descriptive studies have indicated that somatization in children is often precipitated by physical
problems and that although one third to one half of
children with somatization have formal psychiatric
disorders, the majority are not so affected. Children
and their families display evidence of other less marked
psychological difficulties likely to be risk factors for
childhood somatization. These areas include: (i) difficulties in the children's social relationships, personaUty
and temperament; (ii) educational stresses and other
possibly precipitating life stresses; (iii) high rates of
physical and psychological illness in their families; (iv)
perhaps idiosyncratic patterns of family relationships
involving emotional distance regulation and communication on emotional issues; (v) in some children severe
family and personal psychopathology.
Certain psychological mechanisms have been put
forward as explaining the links between these factors and
somatization, for example alexithymia or difficulties in
identifying and expressing feelings, dissociation with
breaking down of the usual connectedness between
physical or psychological experiences, introspection or
excessive tendency to focus on internal bodily experience. The way in which family factors may influence
children's expression of symptomatology through learning or shared physical processes has also been
considered. In the following sections the relevant
evidence pertaining to these issues will be examined.
Biological Dysfunction or Organic Factors Versus
Psychological Factors in Somatisation
The persistence and conviction with which children
complain about physical symptoms for which there is no
obvious organic pathological substrate is often puzzling.
It is sometimes assumed that this very fact justifies a
psychiatric diagnosis but this is not in keeping with
current psychiatric thinking whereby psychiatric disorders are diagnosed when positive features of a
particular disorder are present. A more generally
accepted formulation of somatization is that it reflects
or is an expression of an increased somatic focus
consequent on a tendency to experience and dwell on
physical symptoms. The basis for this may be biological
vulnerability and increased sensations in particular
bodily areas.
This formulation has led to the search for possible
physical anomalies underlying a biological vulnerability.
This search has generally proved only modestly
successful. It will be reviewed here in relation to two
particularly well scrutinised conditions of adults with
child manifestations: the irritable bowel and fatigue
syndromes. The biological evidence will also be
contrasted with the psychiatric findings in these conditions.
(A) Irritable bowel syndrome: definition and biological aspects
Definition. The Irritable Bowel Syndrome (IBS) is a
condition usually seen in adults and defined as a
disturbance of gastro-intestinal function of unknown
cause, though abnormalities of intestinal mobility and
sensations are found in some patients. Children with
recurrent abdominal pains in childhood tend to show a
continuation of these symptoms into adulthood and a
number develop irritable bowel syndrome (Christensen
& Mortensen, 1975). Conversely histories of abdominal
pains in childhood are more common amongst adult
patients with IBS than amongst controls (Jones &
Lydeard, 1992). IBS consists of recurrent abdominal
pain or discomfort which is relieved by defecation and is
associated with changes in bowel motility, frequency
and consistency. Other symptoms such as heartburn,
dyspepsia, flushing, palpitations, migraine and urinary
symptoms are also common (Jones & Lydeard, 1992). It
is estimated that 20% of adults in the industrialised
world suffer this syndrome though only a percentage—
for example a quarter in a London survey—present to
doctors (Jones & Lydeard, 1992). The syndrome
accounts for between one-fifth and half of the referrals
to gastroenterologists (Farthing, 1995).
18 M. ELENA GARRALDA
Biological aspects. Farthing (1995) has recently
reviewed the possible biological substrate including: (i)
disorder of bowel motility; (ii) disorder of sensation of
the gut; (iii) an allergic or infective process; (iv) an
"irritable brain".
(i) Disorders of bowel motility. Studies of colonic
motility have shown that the colon of patients with IBS
seems to be more sensitive to physiological stimuli such
as eating and to possibly pathophysiological stimuli, for
example balloon distension and cholecystokinin, than
the colon of people without the syndrome. "Clustered
contractions" of the small bowel have been detected
during fasting motility in these patients, but these are not
pathognomonic of the syndrome and the finding is not
consistent across studies. Acute stress has been shown to
increase motihty in the small bowel in some studies but
to inhibit it in others and differences in transit time are
again not found uniformly. The findings are regarded as
too heterogenous to provide a unifying hypothesis for the
cause and development of the syndrome.
The issue of abnormal motility has been addressed in
children with recurrent functional abdominal pains.
Cucchiara et al. (1992) examined anomalies in electrical
activity measured via cutaneous electrodes (electrogastrophy) and gastric emptying times via real-time
ultrasonography in children with functional gastrointestinal symptoms. Children had a mean age of 7 years and
suffered from unexplained dyspepsia (most commonly
postprandial vomiting) though many complained also of
pain. The authors found prolonged gastric emptying
times and more irregularities of gastric electrical rhythm
in fasting and fed patients than in controls.
However, the nature of the control group was not well
described, the validity of the method in relation to wellestablished gastrointestinal abnormalities has not been
well documented and in contrast with the predominantly
bradygastria of the present study earlier work has
suggested tachygastria. The role of motility problems
in children with functional gastrointestinal symptoms
requires further elucidation though the contradictory
findings in adults with related conditions such as IBS do
not suggest major breakthroughs in this area.
(ii) and (iii) Disorders of sensation of the gut and
food intolerance. There is suggestive evidence for both
increased sensitivity of the rectum and food intolerance
in patients with IBS but their etiological relevance
remains to be demonstrated (Farthing, 1995; Young,
Stoneham, Petruckevitch, Baton & Rona, 1994; Alun
Jones et al., 1982; Nanda, James, Smith, Dudley & Jewel
1989).
(iv) Inflammatory and infective mechanisms. There
have been reports of inflammatory changes in children
with functional gastrointestinal symptoms. Van der
Meer, Forget and Arends (1990) carried out endoscopic
duodenal biopsy to identify inflammatory changes and
documented intestinal permeability to Cr-EDTA (a
marker of bowel inflammation in conditions such as
coeiiac and Crohn's disease) in children aged 5-12 years
of age with recurrent abdominal pains. They found signs
of inflammation from biopsies in a third of the children
investigated for this. Intestinal permeability to Cr-EDTA
in patients with duodenitis was significantly higher than
in patients with normal duodenal biopsy appearances.
The authors concluded that there was evidence for an
intestinal origin for these patients' complaints but these
conclusions have to be tempered against a number of
methodological problems. These include the lack of
adequate controls, variable numbers of children having
had the investigations under study and the uncertain
validity of the methods used. Others have reported
duodenitis in half the children with epigrastic pain and
even more commonly inflammation of other gastrointestinal areas but this has been based on uncontrolled
studies (Mavronichalis, Zaramboukes, Richman &
Slavin, 1991) and the clinical relevance ofthe classification used to assess duodenitis is questionable since signs
of overt inflammation are seen in healthy volunteers.
The interest in possible infiammatory changes gained
further interest by the discovery of Helicobacter pylori, a
Gram (-) spiral bacterium which is a major cause of
chronic gastritis worldwide and may be an important
factor in the pathogenesis of duodenal ulceration
(Heatley, 1995; Hawkey, 1994). An interesting aspect
of infection with Helicobacter pylori is that it tends to
cluster in families and particularly when people or
families live in crowded or closed environments, with
indications of person-to-person transmission in early life
(Webb et al., 1994). Helicobacter pylori has however not
been shown to have a role in functional gastrointestinal
problems in children such as abdominal symptoms
(Gormally & Drumm, 1994).
' 'An Irritable Brain?": Psychological Associations
It is accepted that emotional factors, for example
acute stress, can produce bowel frequency, nausea,
vomiting. Early satiety and anger may be particularly
likely to increase motility of the colon. Hospital studies
have shown an excess of psychiatric disorders (present in
about a half) and of severe social stresses (i.e. bereavement, marital separations, major arguments or broken
family relationships: present in some two-thirds) in
patients with IBS (Creed, 1994; Farthing, 1995). This of
course also means that a considerable number of patients
do not have psychiatric or depressive disorders.
Psychiatric disorder is of special relevance for patients
who consult doctors because of IBS. Thus the combination of psychiatric disorders, pain perceived as particularly severe and hypochondriacal concerns about illness
is more common amongst IBS patients who consult than
amongst those who do not consult for their symptoms.
It is important to note that psychological factors have
been found to be of relevance for IBS patients whose
psychiatric symptoms are not severe enough to qualify
for a psychiatric diagnosis. For example, these patients
show increased negative cognitions—which are intermediate between those of depressed patients and of
healthy controls—and an excess of negative recalls in
studies of recognition memory (Farthing, 1995).
Work carried out in hospital and community samples
of children with unexplained gastrointestinal symptoms
paralells results in adults in showing an excess of
problems in psychiatric and social adjustment of varying
levels of severity in affected children (Garralda, 1992).
The conclusion from the above is that colonic motility
anomalies, increased gut sensitivity, food intolerance.
SOMATISATION IN CHILDREN 19
inflammatory and infective mechanisms may play a part
in some patients with functional gastrointestinal symptoms. The evidence for associations with psychiatric
problems is stronger and less equivocal but it cannot
fully explain the disorder either. The pragmatic view is
that a somatic component evoked perhaps by an
infection or food intolerance continues in some patients
because of affective disorder or because of attitudes
involving heightened awareness of mild and clinically
unimportant abdominal symptoms previously disregarded.
(B) Chronic fatigue syndrome (CFS)
Definition. The chronic fatigue syndrome—also
called myalgic encephalomyelitis or ME for short,
post-viral fatigue syndrome, chronic mononucleosis,
myasthenia and the "malaise of the eighties" (Sharpe
et al., 1991; Wessely, 1990)—like Irritable Bowel Syndrome is a condition with uncertain nosological status
but one that has attracted substantial attention from the
literature in recent years. In fact it is said to be the first
and only disease legally recognised in Britain, thanks to
a private member's bill passed in 1988 (Richmond,
1989). It probably overlaps with conditions such as
fibromyalgia and chronic Epstein-Barr infection.
Nowadays it is an operational definition for conditions
with disabling physical fatigue, of over six months
duration, unexplained by primary physical or psychiatric
causes. It is often accompanied by other unexplained
physical symptoms and by a belief by the patient in a
biological cause for the condition. Though unproven this
belief is often strong and may be accompanied by a
marked tendency to de-emphasize what to the observer
appear to be relevant associated psychological factors.
Fatigue as a symptom is common in the general
population: over one in five to one in three subjects in
the conununity report fatigue for over a month. Amongst
general practitioner attenders one in ten to one in four
complain of fatigue as a major problem (White, 1989;
Ridsdale, 1991; Pawlikowska et al., 1994; David et al.,
1990; Bass, 1989; Kroenke et al., 1988). The full chronic
fatigue syndrome is however rare. It was present in one
subject amongst 611 surgery attenders in the survey by
David et al., (1990) and in 1% in the community study
by Pawlikowska et al. (1994).
The chronic fatigue syndrome has been described in
children and the characteristics are similar to those in
adults. Fatigue is commonly a feature of psychiatric
disturbance amongst children seen in medical practice
(Garralda & Bailey, 1989) but severely handicapping
chronic fatigue conditions are probably very rare: they
have been described in small groups of children seen
usually in tertiary referral centres.
In these children as in adults, mental fatigue is as
frequently present as physical fatigue, other functional
physical symptoms co-exist and there are often associated mood changes. Rarely it masks severe psychiatric
disorders such as manic-depressive mood swings
(Giannopoulou & Marriott, 1994). The condition tends
to run a protracted course and it is striking that the
handicap caused can be considerably higher than that
seen in children with other severe chronic problems such
as cystic fibrosis or juvenile arthritis (Vereker, 1992;
Walford, Nelson, Mec & McCluskey, 1993; Vandvik &
Forseth, 1994; Scott-Smith et al., 1991). The severe
nature of the associated handicap has also been remarked
in adults: Kroenke et al. (1988) noted that the global
dysfunction associated with fatigue in their patients was
similar to that reported in patients widi untreated
hypothyroidism and in survivors of myocardial infarction and sudden cardiac death.
CFS: biological aspects. In adults fatigue syndromes
may mask a variety of organic disorders but this seems
to happen rarely (Thomas, 1993; Cleary & White, 1993).
In a follow-up study of CFS patients referred to a tertiary
centre laboratory investigations added little to the
clinical assessment which was largely negative for
organic disease (Sharpe, Hawton, Seagroatt & Pasvol,
1992) Amongst patients presenting to general practice
with fatigue, the symptom is deemed to be slightly more
likely to be due to functional or psychological than to
physical causes and laboratory tests contribute to the
diagnosis in only about one in ten patients. In fact the
majority show indications of emotional distress with
high scores on the general health questionnaire (Ridsdale, 1991; Ridsdale et al., 1993).
A number of possible biological anomalies have been
studied as possibly underlying and contributing to the
CFS but most interest has been invested on chronic
infections or immunological disorders.
(i) CFS as an infective or immunological disorder
Prolonged neurasthenia-like syndromes have been
described after infections such as hepatitis, brucellosis
and infectious mononucleosis but the evidence linking
CFS to chronic infection as a major cause has generally
been equivocal or not consistently replicated (Muir,
Nicholson & Banatuala, 1991; Yousef et al., 1988; Gow
et al., 1991; Behan, Beham, Gow, Cavanagh & Gillespie,
1993; Hotopf & Wessely, 1994; Straus, 1993; Folks et
al., 1993; Lloyd, Wakefield & Hickie, 1993).
In view of the strong associations between CFS and
psychiatric morbidity perhaps more promising is the
question of whether stress, personality and depression
are linked with immunological changes which themselves may lead to slow recovery from viral and other
infections in patients with CFS.
There is some evidence to suggest that immunity is
compromised and clinical viral syndromes more common following infection in situations of stress and that
the rate of recovery from viral illnesses is associated
with premorbid psychosocial factors (Hotopf & Wessely,
1994; Cohen, Tyrrell & Smith, 1991; Imboden, Canter &
Cluff, 1961; Bass, 1989, White, 1990). In vitro studies of
depressed patients have shown compromised immunological responses. This suggests that depressive mood
changes in CFS may increase patients' susceptibility to
the acquisition or maintenance of viral illnesses.
However immunological measures do not necessarily
predict outome in CFS (Wilson et al., 1994). It may be
concluded that in spite of for the most part suggestive or
indirect positive evidence, the role of infective and
immunological mechanisms in CFS remain unclear.
(ii) CFS— other biological mechanisms
Physiological studies have shown that patients with
CFS have central subjective fatigue and not a myopathic
disorder (Thomas, 1993; Wessely & Powell, 1989).
Patients with CFS have been shown to experience higher
20 M. ELENA GARRALDA
degree of perceived exertion in relation to the increase in
heart rate during incremental exercise than normal
subjects (Thomas, 1993), but the significance of these
and other reported anomalies such as reduced aerobic
work capacity and chronic habitual hyperventilation
(Riley, O'Brien, McCluskey & Bell, 1990; Rosen, King,
Wilkinson, Nixon, 1990) remains uncertain. The same
may be said of findings indicative of hypothalamic
dysfunction in patients with CFS (Bakheit, Behan,
Dinan, Gray & O'Keane, 1992). The high rate of sleep
abnormalities in small samples of patients with CFS has
led to suggestions that sleep disorder may be important
in the aetiology, as lack of" restorative nighttime sleep
might lead to daytime fatigue (Morris et al., 1993) but
sleep disorders are common and it seems difficult to
explain why some patients only would develop CFS as a
result.
CSF: psychiatric associations. The high rates of
psychiatric disorders, especially mood disorders in
patients with CSF, have been a universal finding in the
adult literature. In tertiary referral centres over twothirds of CFS patients have psychiatric disorders
(Wessely & Powell, 1989). The specificity of the
psychiatric link is demonstrated by the considerable
higher rate of psychiatric disturbance amongst CFS
sufferers than amongst patients with peripheral fatiguing
neuromuscular diseases (Wessely & Powell, 1989;
Wood, Bentall, Gopfert & Edwards, 1991). Overall,
patients with CFS resemble more closely depression than
neuromuscular patients. In community studies fatigue
has been strongly associated with self-reported anxiety,
depression and stress (White, 1989; Pawlikowska et al.,
1994; Ridsdale et al., 1993; Kroenke et al., 1988; Kruesi,
Dale & Straus, 1989; Hickie et al., 1990; Schweitzer,
Robertson, Kelly & Whiting, 1994).
In spite of this CFS cannot be equated with depressive
states. Not all CFS patients have psychiatric disorders
and when present psychiatric morbidity may be
secondary to the disorder rather than precede it (Hickie
et al., 1990). There are also indications of differences
between CFS and depressed patients on main symptomatology and associated factors. For example, CFS
patients may be less likely than other depressed patients
to complain of feelings of guilt, unworthiness and selfblame but more likely to have associated somatic
symptoms (Thomas, 1993). In some studies they do
not show the shortened rapid eye movement sleep
latency characteristic of depression (Morris et al., 1993).
Perhaps the most characteristic difference between
CFS and depressed patients is the strong tendency by
CFS patients to attribute their illness to infective or other
organic factors in the absence of clear evidence, a factor
likely to contribute to the development and continuation
ofthe disorder (Sharpe et al., 1992; Wilson et al., 1994).
Health attitudes will be discussed more fully later.
The work by Wood and Magnello (1992) raises the
interesting possibility that fatigue has closer associations
with changes in positive than in negative affect. Five
separate groups of volunteers measured energy and
aff^ect through visual analogue scales in diaries kept
throughout the day. Changes in positive affect followed
the same pattern as in physical and mental energy and all
three moods were highly correlated with each other.
They were not correlated with negative affect which was
maintained without fiuctuation. The independence of
positive and negative affect led the authors to the
speculation that positive affect (being alert, excited and
enthusiastic) may have a "biological" component
whereas negative affect (being upset, nervous and
irritable) may be more a response to factors external to
the individual. In some cases fatigue and its related lack
of positive affect may have been of etiological value for
the development of secondary negative or depressive
affect.
CFS: biological and psychological associations in
children. The little work which has been carried out in
children with CFS has tended to focus its biological
search on infective diseases.
Clinicians in tertiary referral centres have noted the
lack of explanatory infectious or other diseases in these
children (Dillon, 1978), even though a number of
children show anomalies of unclear significance on
laboratory testing (e.g. atypical lymphocytosis, increased
plasma creatine phosphokinase activity, circulating
immune complexes, minor changes on EEG and
electromyelography, increased serum Epstein-Barr and
Coxsackie B antibody titres and VPI antigen in serum)
(Lask & Dillon, 1990).
It has been noted that amongst children with
serological evidence of viral infection (i.e. elevated
antibody titers) those who report being physically ill
have significantly higher psychological distress questionnaire scores than those who are not clinically unwell,
with prominent central fatigue (trouble remembering,
making decisions and concentrations), thoughts of death
and dying and problems in social relating (feeling of
being watched and people taking advantage of them)
(Meijer, Zakay-Rones & Morag, 1988) thus suggesting
that psychological factors make it more likely for
clinical illness to result from infection. On the other
hand, it is possible for children to be clinically ill, as if
they had suffered an infection, without any evidence of
the latter. Wilson et al. (1989) found that children with
evidence of infection by Coxsackie B virus (CBV) were
similar to investigated but not infected children in terms
of fatigue, presence of lymphadenopathies and pyrexia
and in school nonattendance.
Scott-Smith et al. (1991) carried out serological testing for Coxsackie B viruses, cytomegalovirus, EpsteinBarr virus, human herpes virus 6 and Toxoplasma gondii
in 15 adolescents with CFS. Of interest in this study
were the findings of EBV IgM antibodies in one-third of
CFS adolescents, and of laboratory confirmed acute viral
illness at the start of the illness in nearly two-thirds.
In children and adolescents with CFS depressive
mood changes are common but depressive disorders are
either not present or found in about a third of the sample.
As in adults the majority seem to hold strong organic or
biological attributions of illness (Vereker, 1992; Walford
et al., 1993; Scott-Smith, 1991). When depressive disorders are found, there may be comparatively low rates
of primary depressive mood and anhedonia, suicidality
and agitation (Scott-Smith, 1991). A previous history of
allergies and asthma may be a predisposing factor for the
development of CFS in combination with other factors
SOMATISATION IN CHILDREN 21
such as symptoms in other family members (Bell et al,
1991).
Nonbiological Explanatory Factors
A number of psychological explanations have been
proposed to explain the phenomenon of somatization.
These explanations are very varied in nature but tend to
presuppose a psychological magnification of physiological reactions or experiences. Malingering is a possible
alternative to genuine magnification but in practice
differentiation between magnification and malingering is
too difficult to be of use generally.
In childhood the role of the family specially but also
of other environmental factors are relevant. A commonly
accepted formulation is that children's concerns about
symptoms can be a reflection of parental concerns.
These would lead to amplification of symptoms by both
child and parent and to medical consultation: uncertain
or ambiguous responses by doctors, sometimes excessive
investigations, would lead to further symptom amplification, help-seeking and handicap.
The following sections will review evidence regarding
possible psychological processes and risk factors for the
phenomenon of somatization or expression of distress
through somatic symptoms.
A. Psychological Processes
Various psychological processes have been put
forward in relation to somatisation. Most of this work
comes from the adult literature.
Dissociation. Dissociation has long been formulated
as a disturbance underlying hysterical phenomena and
could be associated with other expressions of somatisation. It represents a failure to integrate different elements
of consciousness producing restriction of conscious
awareness to certain themes of immediate emotional
importance (Kendell, 1983). The usual connectedness
between physical and psychological experiences which
is available to most people would be somehow lost or
reduced. It is assumed that the underlying mental state
would be an altered state of awareness similar to
hypnosis which would be brought about either by severe
stress which allows no physical escape for the victim (for
example in protracted child sexual abuse) or by an
idiosyncratic tendency in some subjects which would be
used by them to gain psychological escape from stresses.
There has been interest in the neurophysiological and
neuropsychological correlates which may be common to
hypnotic states and hysteria or somatisation. Indications
of anomalies in auditory evoked potentials to suggestions, heightened suggestibility and field dependence
and anomalies of vigilance and attention, possibly due to
an impaired ability to filter out and not respond to
meaningless stimuli, have been noted in states of
hysteria and hypnosis but direct evidence of neurophysiological dysfunction in somatisation remains inconclusive (Bendefeldt, Miller & 1976; Toone, 1990; Ron,
1994).
A specific role for the nondominant hemisphere has
been suggested from the observation that conversion
symptoms may be commoner on the left side of the body
and because of non specific EEG abnormalities in the
right hemisphere of patients with gross conversion
symptoms (Ron, 1994). Further work on dissociation,
its brain and psychophysiological functional substrate
may prove enlightening in the study of childhood
somatization.
Alexithymia. Another psychological mechanism
which has been put forward as possibly underlying a
tendency to somatise is alexithymia: a hypothetical
personality construct with the following cognitive and
affective characteristics: (a) difficulties in identifying
and describing feelings; (b) difficulty in distinguishing
between feelings and the bodily sensations of emotional
arousal; (c) restrictive imaginative processes as evidenced by paucity of dreams and phantasies; and (d) a
cognitive style that is concrete and reality-based (Taylor,
Baglay, Ryan & Parker, 1990).
Taylor et al. (1990) and Bagby, Taylor and Parker
(1994) have developed and tested a questionnaire to
study the presence of alexithymia in clinical groups. The
instrument has demonstrated good internal consistency
and test-retest reliability but its validity to differentiate
patients with somatisation and other psychiatric problems is not fully demonstrated since alexithymia as
measured by the questionnaire is also related to
depression and neuroticism (Wise & Mann, 1994;
Cohen, Auld & Brooker, 1994). However, Bourke,
Taylor, Parker and Bagby (1992) in a study of 48
patients with anorexia nervosa found the majority of
patients (77% and only 6% healthy matched controls) to
show alexithymic features and alexithymia was not
related to neuroticism, levels of depression or general
psychoneurotic pathology. Little work in this area has
been carried out in children with somatisation and could
help in the understanding of underlying mechanisms.
Cognitive anomalies: somatic attribution. Increasing interest is being directed at cognitive styles of
appraising physical symptoms which may underline the
somatisation of distress.
The relevance of patients' views about the nature of
their illness is shown by the widely differing ways in
which people respond emotionally to physical illness.
For example the degree of pain and disability in chronic
illnesses such as arthritis may be more closely associated
with cognitive variables than with duration of illness
(Sensky, 1990). It is postulated that individuals who
somatise will display an excessive tendency to attribute
bodily symptoms to organic or pathological causes. This
is in contrast with the tendency most people have to
"normalise" common symptoms by attributing them for
example to something in the environment or to abscribe
them to psychological stresses or psychological states
(Robbins & Kirmayer, 1991). The theory of an excessive
tendency to abscribe symptoms to pathological causes in
patients who somatise was only given partial support in
the study by Rigby, MacLeod and Sensky (1993) of
patients who were frequent attenders to primary care.
These patients displayed difficulty in maldng "normalising" attributions for physical symptoms but they were
not more likely than other attenders to give somatic
explanations.
Patients with chronic fatigue syndrome have been
found to have higher levels of general hypochondriasis
22 M. ELENA GARRALDA
and disease conviction than other general practice
attenders on the Illness Behaviour Questionnaire
(Schweitzer et al., 1994) but this is not a universal
finding. Cope, David and Mann (1994) devised a
questionnaire concerning beliefs about viruses and
validated it amongst general practice attenders. The
authors had predicted an increase in somatic complaints
amongst attenders with a somatic attributional style (i.e.
those who felt powerless in the face of virus and who
believed in the persistence of the virus in the body) but
this was not borne out by their results. Belief in the
persistence of the virus in the body was in fact linked to
psychological distress scores and not to a somatic
attributional style.
In discussing patients' attributions it is important to
consider general societal attitudes and prevailing views.
McLean and Wessely (1994) studied the coverage of
CFS in the British popular and professional press of the
1980s and 1990s. Whereas only 31% of research journals
favoured organic causes, 69% of articles in the national
newspapers and women's magazines did. The authors
concluded that articles in the press concentrate on a
simple model of illness which reinforces the stigma of
psychological illness and dissatisfaction with traditional
medical authority. Press coverage showed a lack of
understanding of psychological medicine and an unintentional perception that physical illness is more valid
and deserving of sympathy than a psychological disease
invalidated by the dismissive term "all in the mind".
Journalists also discussed the image of the arrogant
doctor who contributes to patient dissatisfaction by
rejecting any suggestion of organic disease and discredits the patients' experience of illness.
Numerous accounts by patients of dismissive encounters with general practitioners and hospital doctors
are partly confirmed by surveys of doctors' attitudes
towards psychosomatic problems such as CFS. Scott et
al. (1995) have documented how self-diagnosis of ME or
myalgic encephalomyelitis, a condition akin to CFS but
implying neurological dysfunction, was associated with
general practitioners tending to consider the patient less
likely to comply with treatment, more likely to pose
difficult management problems and to take up a lot of
time. Doctors tended to refer them on more for a second
opinion. This suggests that self-diagnosis adds to
difficulties in communicating the nature and management of a poorly understood illness such as ME during
medical consultations adding to the misunderstanding
and somatising beliefs of sufferers. In a survey by
Woodward, Broom and Legge (1995) doctors were often
reluctant to make a diagnosis of fatigue syndrome but
patients reported that obtaining a diagnosis was the
single most helpful event in the course of their illness.
The work discussed so far in this section has
addressed the adult literature but it seems plausible that
beliefs and attitudes in the child and family are similarly
relevant for childhood somatisation. Walford et al.
(1993) noted that of their 12 children with CFS six felt
that their illness was physical and that there was no
psychological element, six felt that doctors had not
believed them and four felt unhappy about the way they
had been treated by medical services. In a study of
childhood conversion hysteria, Leslie (1988) described
critical attitudes towards doctors by parents who felt that
their child's illness had not been diagnosed and treated
properly. Parental attitudes regarding somatization in
their children will be discussed later.
A better understanding of child and family beliefs
about illness is of interest and may lead to helpful
interventions. This will have to be considered in the
context of possible means of infiuencing doctor and
society's attitudes in this area.
Introspection. The closer links of childhood somatisation with mood disorders than with "externalising"
problems such as conduct disorders suggest that the
somatisation of distress could be construed as a
manifestation of an enhanced tendency to focus on
internal states and encompassing both emotions and
physical sensations. McCauley, Carlson and Calderonl
(1991) used questionnaires to elicit the presence of
somatic symptoms amongst 100 depressed children and
adolescents and 38 psychiatric controls. Somatic symptoms were present in 70% of depressed subjects but only
in 34% controls and they increased with greater severity
ratings of depression. In adults there is evidence that
some anxious and hypochondriacal patients have greater
awareness of bodily functions than phobic patients
(Tyrer, Lee & Alexander, 1989).
Somatisation in children tends to be classified under
the general umbrella of internalising or emotional/
anxiety disorders but further work is required to clarify
the explanatory value of introspection for somatisation.
B. Family Influences
It is well established that parental attitudes and
behaviour greatly infiuence children's psychiatric adjustment and the same is true of somatisation. Somatisation in children is associated with somatic symptoms and
illness in parents and families, children frequently
sharing a variety of symptoms with family members
(Campo & Fritsch, 1994). In adults it has been demonstrated that some types of somatisation disorders with
poiysymptomatic manifestations such as Briquet syndrome cluster in families. These families also have an
excess of antisocial personalities and sociopathy, though
the latter are probably not a feature in the families of
patients with less stringently defined somatisation
disorders. Briquet syndrome includes psychological as
well as physical symptoms and a family history of
criminality may be more common amongst somatising
patients with frequent psychiatric complaints than
amongst those with less disability and more diversity
in physical symptomatology (Murphy, 1990).
There is not sufficient evidence to allow discussion of
genetic versus environmental influences for childhoood
disorders. In the following sections the following will be
addressed: (1) evidence for the clustering of somatisation
and illness in the families of children who somatise; (2)
familial modelling and reinforcement of illness; (3)
parental concern about illness and evidence for a
parental health focus as a possible influence on child
SOMATISATION IN CHILDREN 23
somatisation; (4) family function in children who
somatise.
Family health problems and somatisation. Children
with somatisation have an excess of relatives with
comparable symptomatology and with other psychiatric
disorders. Routh and Emst (1984) studied the mothers of
20 children and adolescents with functional abdominal
pain and compared them with those of 20 children with
abdominal pain due to a clear organic ailment (usually
acute appendicitis). Half the children with somatisation
but only one child with organic pain had one or more
relatives—often female relatives—with somatisation
disorder. In addition, a significantly higher proportion
of children with functional abdominal pain had relatives
with either alcoholism, antisocial or conduct disorder, or
attention deficit disorder. Comparable results were
reported by Kriechman (1987) in a study of 12 families
with two psychiatrically hospitalised children with
somatisation disorder diagnoses, often involving neurological-type symptoms such as seizures. The results are
in line with those in the adult literature in suggesting an
affinity between somatisation disorders and disruptive
psychiatric disorders but they seem at odds with the
child literature which shows a special link between
somatisation and emotional disorders.
In a study of 41 subjects with recurrent abdominal
pain (RAP) and 41 well children. Walker and Greene
(1989) found that both RAP children and their mothers
had elevated levels of anxiety and depression but in a
further survey the authors failed to identify high levels of
parental psychopathology in their RAB group. In fact
they remarked on the adequate personal and family
resources of RAP patients, greater than expected and
something perhaps overlooked in previous literature
(Walker, Garber & Greene, 1993). The discrepancy in
the results between studies may be due to sample
heterogeneity but further work is required to clarify the
reasons accounting for this.
As had done earher reports. Walker and Greene
(1989) and Walker et al. (1993) noted that children with
RAP had comparable levels of psychological distress to
those of 28 children with chronic organic abdominal pain
(Crossley, 1982; Raymer, Weininger & Hamilton, 1984).
They also found that both children with recurrent
abdominal pain and those with peptic disease had higher
rates of family illness including abdominal problems and
other current serious health problems than well children
and than children with emotional disorders. The high
levels of family health problems in the organic group
were at variance with the results of the study by Routh
and Emst (1984) but this may be due to the fact that,
unlike Walker et al., Routh and Emst had studied
children with acute organic conditions. In the comparison with mothers of well children. Walker and Greene
(1989) found high questionnaire scores for anxiety,
depression and somatisation in the mothers of RAP but
not in mothers of children with organic pains.
Taken together these results suggest that children with
RAP may be differentiated from children with chronic
organic abdominal problems by the increased presence
of psychological distress in their families and that a
differentiating feature from children with emotional
disorder is the presence of abdominal and other health
problems in their families. Specific to families of RAP
children would, therefore, seem to be the combination of
abdominal and health problems with psychological
distress. It will be of interest to replicate these results
in other samples of children with somatisation to assess
their generality.
When the reverse design is used, children of parents
with somatisation disorder have been established to
show an excess of somatic complaints (Dura & Beck,
1988; Livingstone, 1993) but the strength of this
association varies in different studies. There is sontie
inconsistency in the findings of increased psychiatric
problems, particularly overanxious disorders, in the
children of parents who somatise. This is again an area
deserving further scrutiny.
Family modelling and reinforcement of illness. The
extent to which familial clustering of unexplained
physical symptoms acts as a leaming model for children
was explored by Bennett Osbome, Hatcher and Richtsmeier (1989). They interviewed 20 children with
recurrent unexplained abdominal pain and children with
sickle cell anaemia also with recurrent but explained
pains. Children with unexplained pain identified more
models and they perceived the frequency and intensity of
their pain as similar to their model's while their parents
failed to report such a relationship. These findings
suggest that the presence of similar symptomatology in
families of children who somatise may have acted by
drawing the child's attention to bodily fluctuations and
sensations. Somatisation in parents can be associated
with particularly high levels of disability (more for
example than mothers suffering from diabetes in the
study by Dura & Beck, 1988) strengthening their
salience for the child.
Parental reinforcement of symptoms and discouragement of coping is also hkely to play a part in the onset
and/or maintenance of symptoms in line with a social
leaming theory perspective on recurrent unexplained
paediatric pain. In Walker et al.'s (1993) study children
with recurrent abdominal pains, in common with
children with peptic disease, perceived greater parental
encouragement of illness behaviour for abdominal pains
than children with emotional disorders and well children.
For example they reported that parents more frequently
responded to symptom complaints with increased
attention and special privileges. In Bennett Osbome et
al.'s sample children with unexplained abdominal pain
described more positive consequences for their pain
behaviour than children with sickle cell anaemia. In
children suffering from a variety of aches and pains,
Dunn-Geier et al. (1986) found an association between
behavioural observations of mothers discouraging coping behaviour with pain during an experimental task and
more symptom-related handicap in the child.
Parental concern about illness, increased child and
family health focus and medical help-seeking. The
work discussed above indicates an enhanced family
health focus for many children who somatise and high
levels of anxiety and mood disorders in these families.
Presumably this will make it more hkely for parents to
seek medical reassurance and consultation. For young
children it seems that specific anxieties regarding illness
are of more relevance for medical help-seeking than
24 M. ELENA GARRALDA
general nonspecific matemal anxieties or mood changes.
For example, in a study of child immunisations, contact
with a paediatric clinic by telephone following the
child's immunisation was particularly frequent amongst
mothers who were anxious prior to the immunisation and
who had infant girls, but it was not related to matemal
perception of the child's fussiness or to matemal trait
anxiety (Hatcher & Powers, 1993).
For older children there are indications that of special
relevance for enhanced medical help-seeking is a
complex pattem combining psychiatric symptoms in
the child with matemal distress and an enhanced health
focus in both parent and child (Garralda, Bowman &
Mandalia, 1996).
Parental concem may be fuelled by contagion. Philen
et al. (1989) described a cluster of illness amongst
students in an elementary school where children had a
variety of signs and symptoms which were attributed to
exposure to recurrent leaks of natural gas at the school.
There was intense media coverage but no actual
evidence of a continuing gas leak. Intense parental
concems regarding the leak were regarded as contributing to the child's symptoms and this was seen as a mass
sociogenic illness. Wessely (1987) has identified parental concem about environmental toxicity as a major
factors for outbreaks of illness, symptoms clustering and
mass hysteria. However the exact nature of matemal
concems has tended not to be explored in depth
(Wessely & Wardle, 1990) and in relation to the child's
psychological vulnerability.
Family characteristics. A review of the literature
regarding marital and family issues in patients with
chronic pain by Roy (1982) identified issues likely to be
of relevance for children too.
Of special interest is a pattem emerging from several
studies indicating a combination of problems in intimate
relationships with marked closeness or togethemess
between family members specifically around health
issues. Work comparing adult patients with somatic
hypochondriacal symptoms and depression and patients
with depression but not pronounced physical symptoms
has shown more disharmonious marriages and sexual
maladjustment amongst depressed patients with somatic
symptoms. More of these patients reported similar
symptoms in their own mothers and tended to view
them as having less positive feelings towards them (see
Roy, 1982).
In support of a role for increased closeness or
togethemess around health issues, Roy (1982) identified
evidence that high levels of agreement between patients
with chronic pain and their families on details such as
duration, location, severity and characteristics of the
pain, were linked to more management problems and
ultimately poorer outcome, and that patients with a
sohcitous spouse reported marginally higher levels of
pain than nonsolicitous spouses.
The relevance of longstanding unsatisfactory intimate
relationships dating back to childhood is highlighted by
recent work carried out in primary care on adults patients
who somatise distress. Somatisers were more likely than
other groups of patients with psychological problems to
report a childhood pattem of parental lack of care (Craig,
Boardman, Mills, Daly-Jones & Drake, 1993). There
was evidence to suggest that the combination of reduced
parental care and illness in childhood may have led to
the development of inadequate strategies to neutralise
the effects of threatening crisis and to somatisation in
adulthood (Craig, Drake, Mills & Boardman, 1994).
It seems important to test these findings against
contemporary research on children who somatise.
Evidence is now emerging from controlled studies that
adolescents with conversion reactions perceive their
upbringing as particularly protected (Wynick, Hobson,
Jones, 1995), but for the most part knowledge on family
function in child somatisation is based on uncontrolled
descriptions. They provide interesting insights deserving
empirical scrutiny.
Seltzer (1985) in an open study of 15 children (14
girls and two boys) referred for consultation/treatment to
a child psychiatric unit with hysterical conversion and
motor disturbance (six cases were severely disabled by
paralysis) described what were perceived as central
features of family function. The author was struck by the
fact, although in line with the literature discussed above
in 12/16 families parents or other significant others had
had similar symptoms to the child's, this had not been
mentioned prior to treatment. The perception of the
primary patient was that he/she was well-equipped
intellectually, well-adjusted socially, a source of pride
for the family. An unusually high number had attended
private school. These high-achieving children have been
described previously in connection with somatisation
(Lask, 1986).
The famihes were intact, in sharp contrast with the
majority of parents in their own famihes of origin (in
nine out ofthe 10 families where this was explored there
had been themes of poverty, social humiUation, family
disintegration) and families often came from unequal
class backgrounds. The author noted that the lifestyles of
conversion families had a marked character of physical
action and exertion and considerable motiUty in social,
geographical and occupation territories. Striking was the
lack of an emotional language attached to recollections
of stressful events and the "supemormalcy": families
worked towards convincing the therapist of its normalcy.
There was an impression that these families did not
employ emotional language.
They did not appear insensitive to feeling states but
conflict seemed seldom acknowledged and worked
through. School problems in the children seemed related
to poorly developed skills in dealing with confiict, with
generally poverty of imagination and expression in
families.
This suggests temperamental styles in family members which might underlie a tendency to somatise
distress. The following two sections will deal with
personality vulnerabilities and with stress factors related
to somatisation in both adults and children. But before
considering these an extreme form of family dysfunction
related to somatisation will be discussed involving
fabricated child illness.
SOMATISATION IN CHILDREN 25
Fabricated illness or Munchausen by proxy. This
refers to illness in a child fabricated by a parent or
someone in loco parentis. The child is presented for
medical assessment and care, usually persistently, and
this may result in multiple medical procedures.
The perpetrator denies the aetiology of the child's
illness and acute symptoms and signs of illness cease
when the child is separated from the perpetrator (Bools,
Neale & Meadow, 1993). It is regarded by some authors
as an exaggerated form of somatisation, but the main
differentiation is that the symptoms in fabricated illness
are wholly and intentionally brought about by the
caretaker, usually a parent. Physical danger to the child
may be immediate with smothering, usually presented as
apnoeic episodes or fits, or with poisoning often
presented as drowsiness or fits.
Fabricated illness is associated with high psychological morbidity in the child. This includes a range of
conduct and emotional disorders and school problems
with difficulty in attention and concentration and
nonattendance but somatisation has not been described
as a prominent sequelae (Bools et al., 1993).
Though the parental behaviour may be regarded as an
extreme example of the enhanced somatic focus and
help-seeking often associated with child somatisation
(Eminson & Postlethwaite, 1992) fabricated illness is
probably a qualitatively different problem. Harm is
induced intentionally by the parent on the child, and the
condition is thus more appropriately regarded as a
manifestation of child abuse.
C. Personality and Temperamental Features
The existing evidence from the adult and child
literature indicates that temperamental and personality
factors, often involving problems in social relationships,
are likely to contribute to somatisation.
Adult literature: personality and socialization. Recent reports continue to provide evidence for the
importance of personality factors for adult somatisation.
Tyrer, Fowler-Dixon and Ferguson (1990) have argued
the validity of the concept of hypochondriacal personality disorder including excessive preoccupation with the
maintenance of health, distorted perception of minor
symptoms and frequent medical consultations as a
characteristic behavioural trait which may underlie
somatisation disorders.
Stem, Murphy and Bass (1993) studied personality in
patients with somatisation disorder. Use of the Personality Assessment Interview by interviewers blind to
diagnosis identified personality disorders in 72% of
patients with somatisation disorder and in only 36% of
control patients with depressive disorders. Most common
amongst patients with somatisation were dependent
personality categories including passive-dependent,
histrionic and sensitive-aggressive personalities, though
most disorder types were represented. Curiously patients
with personality disorder and somatisation had high
extraversion scores on the Eysenck Personality Inventory which seems at odds with the increase in
internalising disorders usually found in patients with
somatisation.
There have been interesting attempts at establishing
biological correlates of psychological features in patients
with somatisation. Uvnas-Morberg et al. (1991a,b) in a
series of reports on individuals with functional disorders
of the gastrointestinal tract have documented an inverse
relationship between gastrin and somatostatin levels in
blood (two substances known to be under autonomic
nervous system control and related to gastrointestinal
dysfunction) and socialization and social dependency
scores. In the laboratory both gastrin and somatostatin
levels were influenced by greeting and stress stimulus
situations. Work of this kind may throw some light on
the biological correlates of both socialization and
somatisation in children.
Socialisation, temperament and somatisation in children. Personality anomalies have been described in
children with a variety of problems involving somatisation (and often associated psychiatric disturbance).
Children tend to be described as habitually conscientious, obsessional, sensitive, insecure and anxious and
they often have problems in relationship with peers
(Garralda, 1992).
Studies using standard temperamental instruments
have identified an increase in temperamental difficulties,
involving irregular temperamental styles and a tendency
to withdraw in new situations in children with recurrent
abdominal pains in comparison with healthy controls
(Davison, FauU & Nicol, 1986) with indications that the
temperamental differences are more persistent than the
abdominal pain, suggesting them as underlying risk
factors. Other studies have found less social competence
scores on the CBCL (Child Behaviour Checklist) in
children with migraine when compared with ill and
healthy controls (Cunningham et al., 1987). Recent work
on adolescents with visual conversion reactions has
identified an excess of problems in peer relationships
and obsessionality traits (Wynick et al., 1995). However
many somatising children have co-morbid mood disorders and it would seem important to establish the
specificity of any temperamental associations of child
somatisation.
The primacy of problems in social relationships for
somatisation was suggested by a study of schoolchildren
frequently attending general practice. Psychiatric disturbance was associated with an increased somatic focus
including the somatisation of distress in the children, and
problems in social interactions, particularly in peer
relationships, were the strongest predictor of disturbance
in this group (Garralda, Bowman & Mandalia 1996).
More controversially, it has been suggested that poor
empathy skills may be important for the development of
psychosomatic disorders such as anorexia nervosa. They
may also underlie the peculiarities in social relationships
described in children with somatisation and their
families. In their epidemiological study of anorexia
nervosa, Rastam and Gillberg (1992) described a trend
for more obsessive-compulsive disorders and personality disorders in the first-degree relatives of anorexia
nervosa cases. There was also a clinical impression on
the part of the examining psychiatrist that a number of
mothers in the anorexia nervosa group had poor empathy
skills, independent of depression, with more staring,
gaze avoidance, conforming to social rules but "not
really being there", unable to empathise with the child's
26 M. ELENA GARRALDA
problems and wanting to understand but lacking
intuition. Two mothers actually met criteria for Asperger
syndrome and had families with a history of Asperger
syndrome. Half the children affected with anorexia
nervosa said that they had no friends, and this was a
feature from early childhood.
As with other work in this area, the study of social
relationships in child sufferers of somatisation and their
families is based on little more than clinical impressions
but it suggests the relevance of temperamental and
personality dysfunction and these should be explored
further.
D. Life Stresses and Somatisation in Children
Preoccupation with loss and death has been described
in children with functional abdominal pains and other
somatisation disorders and in their mothers (Hughes,
1984; Wasserman, Whitington & Rivara, 1988; Kriechman, 1987).
The use of Life Events Checklists has identified an
excess of life events in adolescents attending out-patient
clinics with recurrent abdominal pains (Greene et al.,
1985), although this increased rate might be accounted
for by the increased presence of problems in psychiatric
adjustment in these children (Bailey & Garralda, 1987;
1990). In some surveys of severely affected children,
usually under psychiatric care, sexual abuse has been
regarded as triggering or maintaining the condition
(Kriechman, 1987).
Walker and Greene (1991) took the work on stress and
somatisation further by studying the relation between
negative life events and both symptom severity and
symptom reduction at follow-up in children with
recurrent abdominal pain and in a control group of
subjects with pain of organic origin. As in Bailey and
Garralda's (1987, 1990) study of paediatric clinic
attenders the number of negative events was positively
associated at clinic visit with anxiety and depression in
both groups. However, more events predicted poorer
resolution of pain only in the functional group: in these
children events were associated with continuation of
both anxiety and somatisation.
In a subsequent report. Walker, Garber and Greene
(1994) examined potential moderator variables (i.e. child
social and academic competence on the Harter questionnaire, parental somatic symptoms and child sex) on
child somatic complaints one year after a clinic visit in
197 paediatric patients with abdominal pain. Having
fathers with high levels of somatic symptoms predicted
high levels of somatic symptoms at follow-up, regardless
of the presence of associated life stresses. The relevance
of mediating factors was documented as follows: high
levels of negative events at follow-up were associated
with more somatic symptoms but only in children low in
social competence (i.e. with a lower self-concept) and in
families with high levels of life events. Boys with
mothers with high levels of somatic symptoms also had
high levels of somatic symptoms at follow-up.
This would seem to indicate that lower self-esteem
increases the risk of a continuation of functional
abdominal pains in children exposed to a variety of life
events. The same would apply to having mothers with
high levels of somatic symptoms themselves but this
would impact only on boys, not on girls. These results
point to the likely interaction of parental tendency to
somatise, life events and child psychological adjustment
for the maintenance of functional pains.
As discussed earlier, Craig et al. (1994) have found
that somatising adult patients report more life events
likely to produce symptoms of "secondary gain" from
physical illness than patients with no somatic symptoms.
They are also less likely than depressed patients to adopt
"neutralising" efforts to cope with such a crisis. The
indications, therefore, are that the style of responding is
of as much relevance as the presence of life stresses for
somatisation and this brings into focus the personality
and temperamental features described before.
Educational stresses (high educational demands, poor
school progress, difficulties settling in school) have been
highlighted as of relevance for the somatic symptomatology of children with functional problems (Wynick et
al., 1995), though academic problems where they exist
may be secondary to social and emotional problems in
many of these children (Garralda et al., 1996) and selfesteem regarding academic issues has not been found to
buffer the effects of life stresses in children with
somatisation (Walker et al., 1994). Whatever their origin
it seems likely that for a number of children, educational
and school stresses act as trigger or maintaining factors
for somatic symptomatology (Faull & Nicol, 1986;
Davison et al., 1986; Schor, 1986).
Management
As with other aspects of somatisation discussed so far,
there have been few satisfactory controlled studies to
assess different treatments and their effects on childhood
somatisation. Some of the following will draw on a
recent review ofthe evidence (Garralda, 1995). This will
be complemented by more recent work and by
contributory findings from the adult literature.
As discussed earlier, parents of children with functional symptoms are well aware that the symptom may
be due to "nerves", worries or difficult situations.
Parents tend to play the symptoms down or comfort and
reassure the child and try to find out the cause of the
problem (Faull & Nicol, 1986; Prout, 1988) but many
consult medical services.
Management in Primary Care Services
Little is known about the action taken by general
practitioners for children presenting to surgeries with
functional symptoms beyond the fact that they are given
more follow-up appointments and are referred on more
to secondary services (Garralda & Bailey, 1987). Reassurance, an opportunity to ventilate the problem and
advice to the mother are sometimes provided (Bailey,
Graham & Boniface, 1978).
The potential to intervene at this level is shown by the
fact that mothers value highly assurance from doctors
and they feel that they learn from advice provided during
consultations (Cunningham-Burley & Irvine, 1987). In
children with toddler's diarrhoea and associated behavioural difficulties counselling in primary care for
SOMATISATION IN CHILDREN 27
parental anxiety regarding environmental stress together
with training and support for parents in consistent and
effective management of childhood behaviour (using
operant conditioning principles) led to recovery in twothirds of affected preschool children (Fumell & Dutton,
1986). In this uncontrolled study it was interesting to see
the parallel reduction of somatic and behavioural
symptoms.
The results of an evaluation of brief interventions in
primary care by Finney et al. (1991) were less
conclusive. Children and parents attended a primarycare based psychological consultation service with
individualised treatment guided by problem-specific
protocols. Although many parents indicated improvement in the behavioural problems and there was a global
reduction of medical services use after treatment, there
was in fact a trend for children with psychosomatic
problems in the treated group (and not those in an
untreated group) to increase their service use after
treatment.
Management in Secondary Care Services
Helpful approaches for use at the hospital paediatric
clinic have been outlined by clinicians (Dubowitz &
Hersov, 1976; Apley, 1975; Valman, 1982; Lask &
Fosson, 1989). They involve interest by the doctor in the
child's entire background from the first consultation;
investigations to exclude organic disease confidently
early on; friendly and tactful guidance to help modify
stresses for the child; avoiding questioning the truthfulness of the symptoms and attention to any associated
school attendance and psychiatric problems.
Paediatricians tend to endorse an etiological model of
problems such as recurrent abdominal pains of interacting biological, psychological and social factors and this
is manifested in their approach to assessment and
treatment (Edwards, Mullins, Johnson & Bemardy,
1994).
Specific Treatments for Individual Conditions
Recurrent abdominal pains. Treatment for specific
problems such as abdominal pains and headaches have
been devised for use in community, school, primary care
and outpatient paediatric settings although counselling
by paediatricians is helpful in many cases. Whereas
general nonspecific advice by primary care doctors is
often regarded by mothers of children with recurrent
abdominal pains as not useful (Faull & Nicol, 1986),
helping parents to understand the links between
psychological and physical pain is seen by them as
helpful in making the pain less intense and more
manageable (Wasserman et al., 1988). Apley (1975)
noted improvements in the majority of children with
recurrent abdominal pains treated in his paediatric
outpatient clinic following the principles outlined above.
Comparable results are reported in small-sample
studies using cognitive behavioural techniques. Finney
et al. (1989) treated children with recurrent abdominal
pains referred to primary care based paediatric psychology services using a combined therapy of self-monitoring of pain, limiting the attention given to the symptom.
use of relaxation and dietary fibre supplementation.
They also encouraged the child to participate in routine
activities. The results showed improvements in pain
symptoms and reduced school absences. Sanders et al.
(1989) used a similar treatment in children with
recurrent abdominal pains referred by paediatricians,
family physicians or self-referrals, with indications that
the treatment group improved more quickly than a
nontreatment group. It is however difficult to tease out
from these studies what are the essential ingredients
effecting therapeutic improvement and it seems that the
results are comparable to those using less structured
psychotherapeutically informed paediatric advice.
Sanders, Shepherd, Cleghom and Woodford (1994) in
a methodologically stronger design described the results
of a controlled clinical trial involving 44 7-14-year-old
children with recurrent abdominal pain who were
randomly allocated to either cognitive-behaviour family
intervention (CBFI) or standard paediatric care (SPC).
Both treatment conditions resulted in significant improvements on measures of pain intensity and pain
behaviour, but the children on the psychological
intervention had a higher rate of complete elimination
of pain, lower levels of relapse at 6- and 12-month
follow-up and lower levels of interference with their
activities as a result of pain. Parents reported a higher
level of satisfaction with the treatment. After controlling
for pretreatment levels of pain, children's active selfcoping and mothers caregiving strategies were significant independent predictors of pain behaviour at
posttreatment. The authors suggest that it will now be
important to test the effects of an abbreviated 3-4
session programme to improve cost-effectiveness. It
would also seem important to distil the main active
agents in treatment that could be adapted for use by
clinicians at the paediatric clinic.
Headache and migraine. Work carried out in school
settings and in paediatric outpatient clinics for children
and adolescents with migraine and functional headaches
has shown that tension headaches can be substantially
improved by relaxation training. In some studies of
adolescents this is superior to attention placebo control
and as effective whether administered at tiie clinic or as a
home base self-administered treatment (Larsson &
Mellin, 1988).
McGrath et al. (1988) failed to report a superiority of
relaxation over "placebo" discussions on psychological
topics in young adolescents with headaches severe
enough to lead to referral to a migraine paediatric
neurology clinic. It seemed from this study that attending
a clinic and receiving brief reassurance and assistance
was sufficient to bring relief in a number of cases but
more recent reports suggest that self help relaxation
treatment may be superior to a credible placebo control
in reducing migraine attacks (Larsson, 1992). In a highly
selected sample Osterhaus et al. (1993) combined
relaxation training, temperature biofeedback and cognitive techniques to treat schoolchildren with migraine.
Compared with a waiting list control group, there was an
improvement of headache frequency though not of
intensity in the treatment group. The authors noted that
a decrease in state anxiety and an increase in the ability
28 M. ELENA GARRALDA
to relax during the sessions contributed to headache
improvement.
It seems, therefore, that the use of relaxation and
perhaps other psychological treatments may be promising in the treatment of children and young people with
headaches but further evaluation is clearly required.
Conversion disorder. Accounts outlining what is
regarded clinically as effective psychiatric treatment of
children with conversion disorder emphasise close
liaison between child psychiatrists and paediatricians
and moving the emphasis from the physical to the
psychological at a pace with which the family can cope
(Leslie, 1988; Grattan-Smith, Fairley & Procopis, 1988).
This is frequently combined with physiotherapy and
family work.
Seltzer (1985) has described issues of particular
relevance for family work in these cases. The importance
of engaging the family with discussion of the referring
physical symptoms is emphasized, as well as the use of
imagination and fantasy with "as i f questions, (for
example "Peter, if someone asked your father how his
childhood differed from yours, what might he answer?"). Humour, playfulness, sidetracking to help
discuss delicate issues such as the strength of the marital
unit at the expense of the parental role or attachment
issues were all felt to be helpful for "thawing and
inducing fluidity in frozen cultural systems".
Although the majority of severely affected children
improve remarkably with hospitalisation it is not known
what are the most crucial treatment strategies leading to
improvement. The importance of engaging the family in
treatment seems however paramount and in Vereker's
(1992) small sample of children with chronic fatigue
syndrome a better outcome was suggested for those who
had taken up psychiatric treatment.
Adult studies: further suggestions for treatment. Work
on adults with somatisation has shown that a variety of
techniques may be useful, including behaviour and cognitive treatments, exploratory psychotherapy and group
therapy. Reattribution techniques aiming to establish a
link between a patients' physical symptoms and social
psychosocial stresses are often a key aspect of treatment.
Anti-depressant drugs have also been demonstrated to
have an important role in the treatment of patients with
functional symptoms. Co-ordinated management approaches have been developed for use in primary care
and shown to lead to improved health and reduction of
medical contacts (see Mayou, Bass & Sharpe, 1995).
Reattribution and problem-solving have been found to be
feasible and acceptable in small-sample reports of
patients with unexplained physical symptoms in primary
care (Wilkinson & Mynors-Wallis, 1994).
Treatments are not always easy to implement. Stem
and Femandez (1991) for example described a group
cognitive and behavioural treatment for hypochondriasis
in a general hospital setting. The treatment aimed to help
patients understand how the symptoms arose and how to
cope with stress and was found to have a beneficial
effects on doctor visits and time spent thinking about
illness. However recruitment into the study was difficult
and the authors noted that it took one year to recruit six
severely affected patients.
Wessely and colleagues have described the rationale
and use of a combined treatment of (i) understanding
physical/psychological connections, (ii) cognitive techniques to modify attributional and cognitive factors
which trigger avoidant behaviour and sustain the fatigue
and to promote self-efficacy, (iii) a behavioural approach
to enable the treatment of avoidance behaviour, (iv) a
gradual retum to normal physical activity and gradual
exercise, and (v) the use of anti-depressants (Wessely,
David, Butler & Chalder, 1989; Wessley, Butler,
Chalder & David, 1991). This led in an open trial to
substantial improvements in the majority of severely
affected patients with chronic fatigue syndiome (Butler,
Charder, Ron & Wessely, 1991). Better outcome was
related to less strong initial attribution of symptoms to
exclusively physical causes. Controlled evaluations of
patients with noncardiac chest pain using cognitivebehavioural techniques have shown significant improvements in the treatment group (Mayou, 1992). These
techniques have similarly been found useful for other
manifestations of somatisation and they are becoming
popular clinically though their relative superiority over
other kinds of treatments has not been demonstrated
(Sharpe, 1995).
In a randomised controlled trial of psychotherapy
versus supportive listening, Guthrie, Creed, Dawson and
Tomenson (1993) treated a large sample of 102 patients
with refractory irritable bowel syndrome who had not
responded to medical outpatient treatment. Independent
physical and psychological measures of outcome were
used. For women psychotherapy was found to be
superior to supportive listening with improvements in
both psychological and physical symptoms which were
maintained one year after treatment. There was a similar
but nonsignificant trend for men too. Whether a similar
approach would be appropriate, feasible and effective for
children is an interesting question.
Conclusion
The somatisation of distress is common in children
and takes various forms, including pain, fatigue and loss
of bodily functions. A combination of symptoms is
usually present and in a minority of children symptoms
are sufficiently varied, severe and handicapping to
qualify for somatisation disorder diagnoses. Research
in the area is still barely emerging from the descriptive
phase on small samples or from broad epidemiological
enquiries, and there is much still to be leamt from the
adult literature.
This review has discussed possible mechanisms
contributing to the process of somatisation in children.
It seems possible that minor physiological dysfunction
will contribute in some cases but it is clear that
somatisation can give rise to severely handicapped
function in the absence of obvious underlying organic
pathology. It is also clear that although there is a link
with psychiatric disorders—often mood disorders—these
are probably most prominent in severe cases and when
fatigue is a key feature. Some differences between
subjects who somatise and subjects with mood disorders
are emerging providing a measure of validation for
somatisation syndromes.
Various processes such as dissociation, alexithymia
SOMATISATION IN CHILDREN 29
and abnormal attributions have been outlined as possibly
basic to the psychopathology of somatisation. None are
totally satisfactory but they suggest possible avenues to
scrutinise further the phenomenon and its possible
physiological and psychological associations in children.
Family factors are important for child somatisation.
They include high rates of family health problems and
physical symptoms. A combination of psychological
distress and health problems in families may be specific
to childhood somatisation. Further evidence is emerging
for the role of modelling and contingent reinforcement.
Additional suggested risk factors are a combination of
emotional distance with high togethemess around health
issues in families and anomalies in social relationships
affecting intimate and peer relationships in the sufferers
of somatisation. The nature of possible social deficits
and personality idiosyncrasies deserves further clarification. They may prove to be of relevance for the
modulation of somatising patients's responses to stresses
particularly those involving threatened or actual losses.
Stressful events probably contribute to the onset and/or
maintenance of somatisation in children, specially in
psychologically vulnerable children and when there are
high levels of physical symptomatology in their parents.
A number of open reports and increasingly methodologically stronger studies show that somatisation in
children as in adults can respond to treatments involving
cognitive-behavioural and family techniques as well as
sensitive, psychological sound advice by paediatricians.
The role of anti-depressant medication for childhood
somatisation deserves further study. Work aimed at
modifying or improving social relationships is given
some impetus by the positive results of psychotherapy
interventions for adults with functional gastrointestinal
complaints and deserves to be assessed in children at risk
for somatisation.
References
Abu-Arefeh, I. & Russell, G. (1994). Prevalence of headache
and migraine in schoolchildren. British Medical Journal,
309, 765-769.
Alun Jones, V., Shorthouse, M., McLaughlan, P,, Workman, E.
& Hunter, J. O. (1982). Food intolerance: a major factor in
the pathogenesis of irritable bowel syndrome. The Lancet,
ii, 1115-1117.
Apley, J. (1975). The child with abdominal pains (2nd edn).
Oxford: Blackwell Scientific Publications.
Aro, H. (1987). Life stress and psychosomatic symptoms
among 14-16 year old Finnish adolescents. Psychological
Medicine, 17, 191-201.
Bagby, R. M., Taylor G. J. & Parker, D. A. (1994). The
twenty-item Toronto Alexithymia Scale. Journal of Psychosomatic Research, 38, 23-40.
Bailey, D. & Garralda, M. E. (1987). Children attending
general practice: a study of recent life-events. Journal ofthe
Amercian Academy of Child & Adolescent Psychiatry, 25.
858-864.
Bailey, D. & Ganalda, M. E. (1990). Psychological screening
for the paediatrician. Journal of the Amercian Academy of
Child & Adolescent Psychiatry, 29, 838-835.
Bailey, V., Graham, P. & Boniface, D. (1978). How much
child psychiatry does a general practitioner do? Journal of
the Royal College of General Practitioners, 28. 621-626.
Bakheit, A. M. O., Behan, P. O., Dinan, T. G,, Gray, C, E. &
O'Keane, V. (1992). Possible upregulation of hypothalamic
5-hydroxytryptamine receptors in patients with postviral
fatigue syndrome. British Medical Journal, 304, 1010-
1011.
Bass, C. (1989). Fatigue states. British Journal of Hospital
Medicine, 41, 315.
Behan, P. O., Beham, W. M. H., Gow, J. W., Cavanagh, H. &
Gillespie, S. (1993). Enteroviruses and postviral fatigue
syndrome. Ciba Foundation Symposium, 173, 146-159.
Beidel, D. G., Christ, M. A, G. & Long, P. J. (1991). Somatic
complaints in anxious children. Journal ofAbnormat Child
Psychology, 19. 659-670.
Bell K. M., Cookfair, D., Bell D. S., Reese, P. & Cooper, L.
(1991). Risk factors associated with chronic fatigue
syndrome in a cluster of pediatric cases. Review of
Infectious Diseases, 13 (suppl. 1), S32-S38.
Bendefeldt, F., Miller, L. L. & Ludwig, A. M. (1976).
Cognitive performance in conversion hysteria. Archives of
General Psychiatry, 33, 1250-1254.
Benjamin, S., & Eminson, D. M. (1992), Abnormal illness
behaviour: childhood experiences and long term
consequences. Intemational Review of Psychiatry, 4, 55-
70,
Bennett Osbome, R,, Hatcher, J. W., & Richtsmeier, A. J.
(1989). The role of social modeling in unexplained pediatric
pain. Journal of Pediatric Psychology, 14. 43-61.
Bools, C. N., Neale, B. A. & Meadow, S. R. (1993). Follow up
of victims of fabricated illness (Munchausen Syndrome by
proxy). Archives of Disease in Childhood. 69. 625-630.
Bourke, M. P., Taylor, G. J., Parker, J. D. A. & Bagby, R, M.
(1992). Alexithymia in women with Anorexia Nervosa: a
preliminary investigation. British Journal of Psychiatry,
161. 240-243.
Butler, S., Charder, T., Ron, M. & Wessely, S. (1991).
Cognitive behavioural therapy in the chronic fatigue
syndrome. Journal of Neurology, Neurosurgery and
Psychiatry, 54, 153-158.
Campo, J. V. & Fritsch, S. L. (1994). Somatisation in children
and adolescents. Journal of American Academy Children
and Adolescent Psychiatry, 33. 1223-1235.
Christensen, M. F, & Mortensen, O. (1975). Long term
prognosis in children with recurrent abdominal pain.
Archives of Disease in Childhood, 50. 110-114.
Cleary, K. J, & White, P. D. (1993). Gilbert's and chronic
fatigue syndromes in men. Lancet, 341, 842.
Cohen, K,, Auld, F. & Brooker, H. (1994). Is alexithymia
related to psychosomatic disorder and somatising? Journal
of Psychosomatic Research, 38, 119-127.
Cohen, S., Tyrrell, D. A. J. & Smith, A. P. (1991).
Psychological stress and susceptibility to the common
cold. New England Journal of Medicine, 325, 606-612.
Cope, H., David, A. & Mann, A. (1994). "Maybe it's a
virus?": Beliefs about viruses, symptom attributional style
and psychological health. Journal of Psychosomatic
Research, 38, 89-98,
Craig, T. K. J., Boardman, A. P., Mills, K., Daly-Jones, O. &
Drake, H. (1993). The South London somatisation study I:
longitudinal course and the influence of early Jife
experiences. British Journal of Psychiatry, 163. 579-588.
Craig, T. K. L., Drake, H., Mills, K. & Boardman, A. P.
(1994). The South London somatisation study II: influence
of stressful life events and secondary gain. British Journal
of Psychiatry, 165, 248-258.
Creed, F. (1994), Psychological treatment is essential for
some. British Medical Journal, 309. 1647-1648.
Crossley, R. B. (1982). Hospital admissions for abdominal
pain in childhood. Journal of Royal Society of Medicine, 75,
772-776.
Cucchiara, S., Riezo, G., Minella, R., Pezzolla, F., Giorgio, I.
30 M. ELENA GARRALDA
& Auricchio, S. (1992), Electrogastrography in nonulcer
dyspepsia. Archives of Disease in Childhood, 67, 613-617.
Cunningham-Burley S. & Irvine, S. (1987). Practice research
"And have you anything so far?". An examination of lay
treatment of children's symptoms. British Medical Joumal,
295, 700-702.
Cunningham, S. J., McGrath, P. J., Ferguson, H, B.,
Humphreys, P., D'Astous, J., Latter, J., Goodman, J. T. &
Firestone, P. (1987). Personality and behavioural characteristics in pediatric migraine. Headache, 27. 16-20.
David, A,, Pelosi, A,, McDonald, E., Stephens, D,, Ledger, D,,
Rathbone, R, & Mann, A. (1990). Tired, weak, or in need of
rest: fatigue among general practice attenders. British
Medical Joumal, 301, 1199-1202.
Davison, I, S,, Faull, C, & Nicol, A, R. (1986), Research note:
temperament and behaviour in six year olds with recurrent
abdominal pain: a follow up, Joumal of Child Psychology
and Psychiatry, 27, 539.
Dillon,- M, J. (i978). "Epidemic Neuromyasthenia" at the
Hospital for Sick Children, Great Ormond Street, London.
Postgraduate Medical Joumal, 54, llS-TiQ.
Dubowitz, V. & Hersov, L. (1976). Management of children
with nonorganic (hystrical) disorders of motor function.
Development Medicine and Child Neurology, 18. 358-368.
Dunn-Geier J., McGrath P. J., Rourke, B. P., Latter, J. &
D'Astous, D. (1986). Adolescent chronic pain: the ability to
cope. Pain, 26, 23-32.
Dura, J. R. & Beck, S. J. (1988). A comparison of family
functioning when mothers have chronic pain. Pain, 35, 79-
89.
Edwards, M. C, Mullins, L. L., Johnson, J. & Bemardy, N.
(1994). Survey of pediatricians' management practices for
recurrent abdominal pain. Joumal of Pediatric Psychology,
19. 241-253.
Eminson, D. M. & Postlethwaite, R. J. (1992). Factitious
illness: recognition and management. Archives of Disease in
Childhood, 67, 1510-1516.
Farthing, M. J, G. (1995). Irritable bowel, irritable body or
irritable brain? British Medical Joumal, 310, 171-175.
Faull, C. & Nicol, A, R. (1986), Abdominal pain in six year
olds: an epidemiological study in a new town. Joumal of
Child Psychology and Psychiatry, 27. 251-60,
Finney, J. W,, Lemanek, K, L,, Cataldo, M. F., Katz, H, P. &
Fuqua, R. W. (1989). Pediatric psychology in primary
health care: brief targeted therapy for recurrent abdominal
pain. Behaviour Therapy, 20, 283-91.
Folks, T, M,, Heneine, W., Khan, A., Woods, T,, Chapman, L.
& Schonberger, L, (1993). Investigation of retroviral
involvement in chronic fatigue syndrome. Ciba Foundation
Symposium, 173, 176-192.
Fumell, J. R. G. & Dutton, P. V, (1986). Alleviation of
toddler's diarrhoea by environmental management. Joumal
of Psychosomatic Research, 30. 283-288.
Garber, J., Walker, L. S. & Zeman, J, (1991), Somatisation
symptoms in a community sample of children and
adolescents: further validation ofthe children's somatisation
inventory. Joumal of Consulting and Clinical Psychology,
3, 588-595,
Garralda, M. E. (1992). A selective review of child psychiatric
syndromes with a somatic presentation, British Joumal of
Psychiatry, 161. 759-773,
Garralda, M, E. (1995). The management of functional somatic
symptoms in children. In R. Mayou, C. Bass & M. Sharpe
(Eds), Treatment of somatic symptoms. Oxford: Oxford
University Press,
Garralda, M. E. & Bailey, D. (1987). Psychosomatic aspects of
children's consultations in primary care. Archives of
Psychiatry and Neurological Sciences, 236. 319-322.
Garralda, M. E. & Bailey, D. (1989). Psychiatric disorders in
general paediatric referrals. Archives of Disease in
Chldhood, 64, 1727-1733.
Garralda, M. E. & Bailey, D. (1990). Paediatric identification
of psychological factors associated with general paediatric
consutlations. Joumal of Psychosomatic Research, 34. 303-
312.
Garralda, M. E., Bowman, F. M. & Mandalia (1996). The
increased somatic focus of psychiatrically distrubed children attending primary care. (Submitted for publication.)
Giannopoulou, J. & Marriott, S. (1994). Chronic fatigue
syndrome or affective disorder? Implications of the
diagnosis on management. European Child & Adolescent
Psychiatry, 3, 97-100.
Goodman, J, E, & McGrath, P, J. (1991). The epidemiology of
pain in children and adolescents: a review. Pain, 46, 247-
264.
Gormally, S. & Drumm, B. (1994). Helicobacter pylori and
gastrointestinal symptoms. Archives of Disease in
Childhood, 70, 165-166,
Gow, J. W,, Behan, W, M. H., Clements, G. B., Woodall, C,
Riding, M. & Behan, P. O. (1991). Enteroviral RNA
sequences detected by Polymerase chain reation in muscle
of patients with postviral fatigue syndrome. British Medical
Joumal, 302. 692-696,
Gratton-Smith, P,, Fairley, M. & Procopis, P. (1988). Clinical
features of conversion disorder. Archives of Disease in
Childhood, 63. 408^14,
Greene, J. W,, Walker, L. S., Hickson, G. & Thompson, J.
(1985). Stressful life events and somatic complaints in
adolescents. Pediatrics, 75, 19-22.
Guthrie, E., Creed, F., Dawson, D. & Tomenson, B. (1993). A
randomised controlled trial of psychotherapy in patients
with refractory irritable bowel syndrome. British Joumal of
Psychiatry, 163, 315-321.
Hatcher, J, W,, Powers, L, L. & Richtsmeier, A, J, (1993).
Parental anxiety and response to symptoms of minor illness
in infants. Joumal of Pediatric Psychology, 16, 397-408.
Hawkey, C. J. (1994). Eradication of Helicobacter pylori
should be pivotal in managing peptic ulceration: eradication
largely prevents relapse. British Medical Joumal, 309.
1570-1571.
Heatley, R, V. (1995). H. pylori infestion: how relevant is it
clinically. Hospital Update, 20, 119-124.
Hickie, I,, Lloyd, A., Wakefieid, D. & Parker, G, (1990). The
psychiatric status of patients with the chronic fatigue
syndrome. British Joumal of Psychiatry, 156. 534-540.
Hopkins, A. (1992). The management of patients with chronic
headache not due to obvious structural disease. In F. Creed,
R. Mayou & A. Hopkins (Eds), Medical Symptoms not
explained by Organic Disease (pp. 34-46), London: Royal
College of Psychiatrists, Royal College of Physicians.
Hotopf, M. H. & Wessely, S. (1994). Viruses, neurosis and
fatigue. Joumal of Psychosomatic Research, 38. 499-514.
Hughes, M. C. (1984). Recurrent abdominal pain and childhood depression: clinical observations of 23 children and
their families. American Joumal of Orthopsychiatry, 57.
146-155.
Imboden, J, B,, Canter, A, & Cluff, L. E. (1961). Convalescence from influenza a study of psychological and clinical
determinants. Archives of Intemal Medicine, 108. 393-399.
Jones, R. & Lydeard, S. (1992), Irritable bowel syndrome in
the general population. British Medical Joumal, 304. 87-
90.
Kendell, R. E. (1983). Hysteria. In Russell, F. M. & Hersov, L.
(Eds), Handbook of Psychiatry, Vol. 4. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
Kriechman, A. M. (1987). Siblings with Somatoform disorders
in childhood and adolescence. Joumal of American
Academy Child and Adolescent Psychiatry, 26, 226-231.
SOMATISATION IN CHILDREN 31
Kroenke, K., Wood, D. R., Mangelsdorff, D., Meier, N. J. &
Powell, J. B. (1988). Chronic fatigue in primary care:
prevalence, patient characteristics, and outcome. Joumal of
the American Medical Association, 260, 239-934,
Kruesi, M, J. P,, Dale, J, & Straus, S. E. (1989). Psychiatric
diagnoses in patients who have chronic fatigue syndrome.
Joumal of Clinical Psychiatry. 50. 53-56,
Larsson, B. (1992). Behavioural treatment of somatic disorders
in children and adolescents. European Child & Adolescent
Psychiatry, 1. 68-81.
Larsson, B. & Mellin, L. (1988). The Psychological Treatment
of recurrent headache in adolescents—short term outcome
and its prediction. Headache, 28, 187-195.
Lask, B. (1986). The high-achieving child. Postgraduate
Medical Joumal, 62. 143-145,
Lask B. & Dillon, M. J. (1990). Postviral fatigue syndrome.
Archives of Disease in Childhood, 65, 1198.
Lask, B. & Fosson, A. (1989). Childhood illness. The
psychosomatic approach. Chichester: Wiley.
Leslie, S. A. (1988). Diagnosis and treatment of hysterical
conversion reactions. Archives of Disease in Childhood, 63.
506-511.
Lipowski, Z. J. (1988). Somatisation: the concept and its
clincial application. American Joumal of Psychiatry, 145,
1358-1368.
Livingstone, R. (1993). Children of people with somatisation
disorder. Journal of American Academy Child Adolescent
Psychiatry, 32. 536-544,
Lloyd, G. G. (1986). Psychiatry syndromes with a somatic
presentation, Joumal df Psychosomatic Research, 30, 113-
120.
Lloyd, A. R., Wakefieid, D. & Hickie, I. (1993). Immunity and
the pathophysiology of chronic fatigue syndrome. Ciba
Foundation Symposium, 173, 176—192.
Mavromichalis, I., Zaramboukas, T. H., Richman, P, I, &
Slavin, G, (1991). Recurrent abdominal pain of gastrointestinal disorder. Archives of Disease in Childhood, 66,
905.
Mayou, R. (1992), Patients' fears of illness: chest pains and
palpitations. In F, Creed, R, Mayou & A, Hopkins (Eds),
Medical symptoms not explained by organic disease (pp.
25-33). London: Royal College of Psychiatrists, Royal
College of Physicians.
Mayou, R., Bass, C. & Sharpe M. (1995). Treatment of
functional somatic symptoms. Oxford: Oxford University
Press.
McCauley, E., Carlson, G. A. & Calderon, R. (1991), The role
of somatic complaints in the diagnosis of depression in
children and adolescents. Joumal of American Academy
Child and Adolescent Psychiatry, 30, 631-635.
McGrath, P. J., Humphreys, P., Goodman, J, T., Keene, D.,
Firestone, P., Jacob, P. & Cunningham, S. J. (1988),
Relaxtion prophylaxis for childhood migraine a randomised
placebo-controlled trial. Development Medicine and Child
Neurology, 30. 626-31.
MacLean, G & Wessely, S. (1994). Professional & popular
views of chronic fatigue syndrome. British Medical Joumal,
308.116-111.
Meijer, A., Zakay-Rones, Z. & Morag, A. (1988). Postinfluenzal psychiatric disorder in adolescents. Acta
Psychiatrica, 78, 176-181,
Morris, R., Sharpe, M., Sharpley, A. L., Cowen, P., Hawton,
K. & Morris, J. (1993). Abnormalities of sleep in patients
with the chronic fatigue syndrome. British Medical Joumal,
306. 1161-1164.
Mortimer, M. J., Kay, J. & Jaronl, A,, (1992). Epidemiology of
headache and childhood migraine in an urban general
practice using ad hoc, Vahlquist and his criteria. Developmental Medicine and Child Neurology, 34, 1095-1101.
Muir, P., Nicholson, F. & Banatuala, J. E. (1991). Coxsackie B
virus and postviral fatigue syndrome. British Medical
Joumal, 302, 658-659.
Murphy, M, R. (1990) Classification of the somatoform
disorders. In C. Bass (Ed.), Somatization: physical symptoms and psychological illness (pp. 10-39). Oxford: Blackwell Scientific Publications.
Nanda, R., James, R,, Smith, H., Dudley, C. R. K. & Jewel, D.
P. (1989). Food intolerance and the irritable bowel
syndrome. Gut, 30. 1099-1104.
Offord, D. R., Boyle, M. H., Szatmari, P., Rae-Grant, N. I.,
Links, P. S., Cadman, D. T., Byles, J. A., Crawford, J. W.,
Munroe, B. H., Byrne, C, Thomas, H. & Woodward, C. A.
(1987), Ontario child health study. II. Six-month prevalence
of disorder and rates of service utilization. Archives of
General Psychiatry, 44. 833-836.
Osterhaus, S. O. L., Passchier, J., van der Helm-Hylkema, H.,
de Jong, K. T,, Orlebeke, J. F., de Grauw, A. J. C. &
Dekker, P. H, (1993). Effects of behavioural psychophysiological treatment on school children with migraine in a
nonclinical setting: predictors and process variables.
Joumal of Pediatric Psychology, 18, 697-715.
Pawlikowska, T,, Chalder, T., Hirsch, S, R,, Wallace, P,,
Wright, D, J, M, & Wessely, S, C. (1994). Population based
study of fatigue and psychological distress. British Medical
Joumal, 308, 763-766.
Philen, R. M., Kibourne, E, M., McKinley, T. W, & Parrish, R.
G. (1989), Mass sociogenic illness by proxy: parentally
reported epidemic in an elementary school. Lancet, ii,
1372-1376,
Prout, A, (1988). "Off school sick": mother's account of
school sickness absence. The Sociological Review, 36, 765-
789.
Rastam, M. & Gillberg, C. (1992). Background factors in
Anorexia Nervosa: a controlled study of 51 teenage cases
including a population sample. European Child and
Adolescent Psychiatry, 1, 54-65.
Rauste-von Wright, M. & von Wright, J. (1992). Habitual
somatic discomfort in a representative sample of
adolescents. Joumal of Psychosomatic Research, 36. 383—
390.
Raymer, D., Weininger, O. & Hamilton, J. R. (1984).
Psychological problems in children with abdominal pain.
Lancet, i, 439^40.
Record, C. O. (1994), Helicobacter pylori is not the causative
agent. British Medical Joumal, 309, 1571-1572.
Richmond, C. (1989). Myalgic Encephalomyelitis, princess
aurora, and the wondering womb. British Medical Joumal,
298. 1295-1296.
Ridsdale, L. (1991). Tired all the time: most cases are
managed in primary care—where the research needs to be
done. British Medical Joumal. 303. 1490.
Ridsdale, L., Evans, A., Jerrett, W., Mandalia, S., Osier, K. &
Vora, H. (1993). Patients with fatigue in general practice: a
prospective study. British Medical Joumal, 307, 103-105.
Rigby, M,, MacLeod, A, & Sensky, T. (1993). Causal
attributions of somatic sensations by people who frequently
seek medical help. Poster presented at the 12th Intemational
Congress of Psychosomatic Medicine, Bem.
Riley, M. S., O'Brien, C. J,, McCluskey, D. R. & Bell, N. P.
(1990). Aerobic work capacity in patients with chronic
fatigue syndrome. British Medical Joumal, 301, 953-955.
Robbins, J. M. & Kirmayer, L. J. (1991). Attributions of
common somatic symptoms. Psychological Medicine, 21.
1029-1045.
Ron (1994). Somatisation in neurological practice. Joumal of
Neurology, Neurosurgery and Psychiatry, 57, 1161-1164.
Rosen, S. D., King, J. C, Wilkinson, J. B. & Nixon, P. F. G.
(1990). Is chronic fatigue syndrome synonymous with
32 M. ELENA GARRALDA
effort. Joumal ofthe Royal Society of Medicine, 83. 761-
764.
Routh, D. K. & Emst, A. R. (1984). Somatization disorder in
relatives of children and adolescents with functional
abdominal pain. Jourtml of Pediatric Psychology, 9. 427-
437.
Roy, R. (1982). Marital and family issues in patients with
chronic pain: a review. Joumal of Psychotherapy and
Psychosomatic, 37, 1-12.
Sanders, M. R., Rebgetz, M., Morrison, M., Bor, W., Gordon,
G. & Dadds, M. (1989). Cognitive-behavioural treatment of
recurrent nonspecific abdominal pain: an analysis of
generalisation, maintenance, and side effects, Joumal of
Consulting and Clincial Psychology, 57, 294-300.
Sanders, M. R., Shepherd, R. W., Cleghom, G. & Woodford,
H. (1994). Treatment of recurrent abdominal pain in
children: a controlled comparison of cognitive behavioural
family intervention and standard paediatric care. Joumal of
Consulting and Clinical Psychology, 62. 306-314,
Schor, E. R. (1986). Use of health care services by children
and diagnoses received during persumably stressful life
transitions. Pediatrics, 77, 834—4i.
Schweitzer, R., Robertson, D. L., Kelly, B. & Whiting, J,
(1994). Illness behaviour of patients with chronic fatigue
syndrome. Joumal of Psychosomatic Research, 38. 41-49,
Scott, S., Deary, I. & Pelosi, A. J. (1995). General practitioners
attitudes to patients with a self diagnosis of myalgic
encephalomyelitis. British Medical Joumal, 310, 508.
Scott-Smith, M,, Mitchell, J., Corey, L., Gold, D,, McCauley,
E. A,, Glover, D. & Tenover, F. C. (1991), Chronic fatigue
in adolescents. Pediatrics, 88, 195-202.
Seltzer, W. J. (1985). Conversion disorder in childhood and
adolescence: a familial/cultural approach—part 1. Family
Systems Medicine, 3, 261-280.
Sensky, T. (1990). Patient's reactions to illness. British
Medical Joumal, 300, 622-623,
Seshia, S,, Wolstein, J, R., Booth, F. A,, Reggin, J. D. &
Adams, C. (1994), IHS criteria in childhood. Developmental
Medicine and Child Neurology, 36, 419^28.
Sharpe, M. (1995). Cognitive behavioural therapies in the
treatment of functional somatic symptoms. In R. Mayou, C.
Bass & M. Sharpe (Eds) Treatment of Functional Somatic
Symptoms (pp. 122-143), Oxford: Oxford University Press.
Sharpe, M. C, Archard, L. C, Banatvala, J. E., Borysiewicz,
L. K., Clare, A. W. & David, A,, et al. (1991). A report.
Chronic fatigue syndrome: guidelines for research. Joumal
ofthe Royal Society of Medicine, 84, 118-121.
Sharpe, M., Hawton, K., Seagroatt, V. & Pasvol, G., (1992).
Follow up of patients presenting with fatigue to an
infectious diseases clinic. British Medical Joumal, 305,
147-152.
Spiller, R. C. (1994). Irritable bowel or irritable mind?
Medical treatment works for those with clear diagnosis.
British Medical Joumal, 309, 1646-1647.
Starfield, B., Gross, E., Wood, M,, Pantell, R,, Allen, C,
Gordon, B., Moffatt, P., Drachman, R, & Katz, H. (1980).
Psychosocial and psychosomatic diagnoses in primary care
of children. Pediatrics, 66, 159-167.
Stem, R, & Femandez, M. (1991). Group cognitive and
behavioural treatment of hypochondriasis. British Medical
Joumal, 303. 1229-1231.
Stem, K., Murphy, M. & Bass, C. (1993). Personality disorders
in patients with somatisation disorder: a controlled study,
British Joumal of Psychiatry, 163, 785-789.
Straus, S. E. (1993). Studies of herpesvirus infection in chronic
fatigue syndrome. Ciba Foundation Symposium, 173, 132-
145.
Taylor, G. J., Baglay, M., Ryan, D. P & Parker, J. D. A.
(1990). Validation of the Alexithymia Construct: a measurement-based approach. Canadian Joumal of Psychiatry,
35, 290-297.
Thomas, P. K. (1993), The chronic fatigue syndrome: what do
we know? That it's a complex intraction of cerebral
dysfunction, trigger factors, and social attitudes. British
Medical Joumal, 306, 1557-1558.
Toone, B, K, (1990). Disorders of mysterical conversion. In C.
Bass (Ed.), Somatization: physical symptoms & psychogical
illness (pp. 207-234). Oxford: Blackwell Scientific Publications.
Tyrer, P., Lee, I. & Alexander, J. (1989). Awareness of cardiac
function in anxious, phobic and hypochondriacal patients.
Psychological Medicine, 10, 171-174.
Tyrer, P., Fowler-Dixon, R. & Ferguson, B. (1990). The
justification for the diagnosis of hypochondriacal personality disorder. Joumal of Psychosomatic Research, 34, 637-
642.
Uvnas-Moberg, K., Am, I., Theorelle, T. & Jonsson, C. O.
(1991b). Gastrin, somatostatin and oxytocin levels in
patients with functional disorders of the gastrointestinal
tract and their response to feeding and interaction. Joumal
of Psychosomatic Research, 35, 525-533.
Valman, B. (1982), The ABC of 1 to 7. London: British
Medical Association.
Van der Meer, S. B,, Forget, P. P. & Arends, J. W. (1990).
Abnormal small bowel permeability and duodenitis in
recurrent abdominal pain. Archives of Disease in
Childhood, 65. 1311-1314.
Vandvik, H. D. & Forseth, K. O. (1994). A biopsychosocial
evaluation of ten adolescents with Fibromyalgia. Acta
Paediatrica, 83,166-11 \.
Vereker, M. (1992), Chronic fatigue syndrome: a joint
paediatric-psychiatric approach. Archives of Disease of
Childhood, 67, 505-555.
Walford, G. A., Nelson, W. McC. & McCluskey, D. R. (1993).
Fatigue, depression and social adjustment in chronic fatigue
syndrome. Archives of disease in childhood, 68, 384—388.
Walker, L. S. & Green, J, W. (1989). Children with recurrent
abdominal pain and their parents: more somatic complaints,
anxiety, and depression than other patient families? Joumal
of Pediatric Psychology, 14. 231-243.
Walker, L. S. & Greene, J. W. (1991). Negative life events and
symptom resolution in pediatric abdominal pain patients.
Joumal Pediatric Psychology, 16, 341-360.
Walker, L. S., Garber J. & Greene, J. W. (1991). Somatisation
symptoms in pediatric abdominal pain patients: relation to
chronicity of abdominal pain and parent somatization.
Joumal of Abnormal Child Psychology. 19. 379-394.
Walker, L. S., Garber, J. & Greene, J. W. (1993). Psychosocial
correlates of recurrent childhood pain: a comparison of
pediatric patients with recurrent abdominal pain, organic
illness and psychiatric disorders. Joumal of Abdominal
Psychology, 102. 248-258.
Walker, L. S., Gaber, J. & Greene, J. W. (1994). Somatic
complaints in pediatric patients: a prospective study of the
role of negative life events, child social and academic
competence and parental somatic symptoms. Joumal of
Consulting and Clinical Psychology. 62. 1213-1221.
Wasserman, A, L., Whitington, P. F. & Rivara, F. (1988).
Psychogenic basis for abdominal pain in children and
adolescents. Joumal of American Academy Child and
Adolescent Psychiatry, 27. 179-184.
Webb, P. M., Knight, T., Greaves, S., Wilson, A., Newell, D.
G., Elder, J. & Forman, D. (1994). Relation between
infection with Helicobacter pylori and living conditions in
childhood: evidence for person to person transmission in
early life. British Medical Joumal, 308. 750-753.
Wessely, S. (1987). Mass hysteria: two syndromes? Psychological Medicine, 17, 109-120.
SOMATISATION IN CHILDREN 33
Wessely, S. (1990). Old wine in new bottles: neurasthenia and
"ME". Psychological Medicine, 20. 35-53.
Wessely, S. & Powell, R. (1989). Fatigue syndromes: a
comparison of chronic "postviral" fatigue with neuromuscular and affective disorders. Joumal of Neurology and
Neurosurgery Psychiatry, 52. 940-948.
Wessely, S. & Wardle, C. J. (1990). Mass sociogenic illness by
proxy: parentally reported epidemic in an elementary
school. British Joumal of Psychiatry, 157, 421^24,
Wessely, S., David, A., Butler, S. & Chalder, T, (1989).
Management of chronic (post-viral) fatigue syndrome,
Joumal of the Royal College of General Practitioners, 39.
26-29.
Wessely, S., Butler, S., Chalder, T. & David, A. (1991). The
cognitive behavioural management of the post-viral fatigue
syndrome in "post-viral fatigue syndrome". In R. Jenkins &
J. Mowbray (Eds), Post-viral fatigue syndrome. Chichester:
John Wiley & Sons.
White, P. (1989). Fatigue syndrome: neurasthenia revived,
British Medical Joumal. 298. 1119-1200.
White, P. D. (1990). Fatigue and chronic fatigue syndromes. In
C. Bass (^Ed.), Somatization: physical symptoms and
psychological illness (pp. 104-140), Oxford: Blackwell
Scientific Publications.
Wilkinson, P. & Mynors-Wallis, L. (1994). Problem solving
therapy in the treatment of unexplained physical symptoms
in primary care: a preliminary study, Joumal of Psychosomatic Research, 38. 591-598.
Wilson, P. M. J., Kusumaker, V,, McCartney, R. A, & Bell, E,
J. (1989). Features of Coxsackie B virus (CBV) infection in
children with prolonged physical and psychological
morbidity. Joumal of Psychosomatic Research, 33. 29-36.
Wilson, A., Hickie, I., Lloyd, A., Hadzi-Pavlovic, D.,
Boughton, C, Dwyer, J. & Wakefieid, D. (1994). Longitudinal study of outcome of chronic fatigue syndrome.
British Medical Joumal, 308. 756-759.
Wise, T. N. & Mann, L. S. (1994). The relationship between
somatosensory amplification, Alexithymia and Neuroticism.
Joumal of Psychosomatic Research, 38, 515-521.
Wood, C. & Magnello, M. E. (1992). Diversional changes in
perceptions of energy and wood. Joumal of the Royal
Society of Medicine, 85. 191-194.
Wood, G. C, Bentall, R. P., Gopfert, M. & Edwards, R. H. T.
(1991). A comparative psychiatric assessment of patients
with chronic fatigue syndrome and muscle disease.
Psychological Medicine, 21, 619-628.
Woodward, R. V., Broom, D. H. & Legge, D. G. (1995).
Diagnosis in chronic illness: disabling or enabling—the case
of chronic fatigue syndrome. Joumal ofthe Royal Society of
Medicine, 88, 325-329,
Wynick, S., Hobson, R. P. & Jones, B. (1995). Psychogenic
disorders of vision in childhood ("visual conversion
reactions"), personal communication.
Young, E., Stonehame, M. D. & Petruckevitch, Baton, J. &
Rona, R. (1994), A population study of food intolerance.
Lancet, 343, 1127-1129.
Yousef, E. G., Bell, E. J., Mann, G. F., Murugesan, V., Smith,
D. G., McCartney, R, A. & Mowbray, J. F. (1988). Chronic
enterovirus infection in patients with postviral fatigue
syndrome. Lancet, 146-150.
Accepted manuscript received 21 August 1995
